Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2004.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-187 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 12-187. (a) No city shall impose a retailers' sales tax under the
provisions of this act without the governing body of such city having first
submitted such proposition to and having received the approval of a
majority of the electors of the city voting thereon at an election called and
held therefor. The governing body of any city may submit the question of
imposing a retailers' sales tax and the governing body shall be required to
submit the question upon submission of a petition signed by electors of
such city equal in number to not less than 10% of the electors of such city.
(b) (1) The board of county commissioners of any county may submit
the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax to the electors at
an election called and held thereon, and any such board shall be required
to submit the question upon submission of a petition signed by electors of
such county equal in number to not less than 10% of the electors of such
county who voted at the last preceding general election for the office of
secretary of state, or upon receiving resolutions requesting such an election
passed by not less than 2/ of the membership of the governing body of

each of one or more cities within such county that contains a population of
not less than 25% of the entire population of the county, or upon receiving
resolutions requesting such an election passed by 2/ of the membership of

the governing body of each of one or more taxing subdivisions within such
county that levy not less than 25% of the property taxes levied by all
taxing subdivisions within the county.
(2) The board of county commissioners of Anderson, Atchison,
Barton, Brown, Butler, Chase, Cowley, Cherokee, Crawford, Ford,

HB 2004—Am. by SC 2
Franklin, Grant, Jefferson, Linn, Lyon, Marion, Miami, Montgomery,
Neosho, Osage, Ottawa, Reno, Riley, Saline, Seward, Sumner, Thomas,
Wabaunsee, Wilson and Wyandotte counties may submit the question of
imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax and pledging the revenue
received therefrom for the purpose of financing the construction or
remodeling of a courthouse, jail, law enforcement center facility or other
county administrative facility, to the electors at an election called and held
thereon. The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire when
sales tax sufficient to pay all of the costs incurred in the financing of such
facility has been collected by retailers as determined by the secretary of
revenue. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to allow the rate of
tax imposed by Butler, Chase, Cowley, Lyon, Montgomery, Neosho, Riley,
Sumner or Wilson county pursuant to this paragraph to exceed or be
imposed at any rate other than the rates prescribed in K.S.A. 12-189, and
amendments thereto.
(3) (A) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the result of
the election held on November 8, 1988, on the question submitted by the
board of county commissioners of Jackson county for the purpose of
increasing its countywide retailers' sales tax by 1% is hereby declared
valid, and the revenue received therefrom by the county shall be expended
solely for the purpose of financing the Banner Creek reservoir project. The
tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall take effect on the effective
date of this act and shall expire not later than five years after such date.
(B) The result of the election held on November 8, 1994, on the
question submitted by the board of county commissioners of Ottawa
county for the purpose of increasing its countywide retailers' sales tax by
1% is hereby declared valid, and the revenue received therefrom by the
county shall be expended solely for the purpose of financing the erection,
construction and furnishing of a law enforcement center and jail facility.
(C) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the result of the
election held on November 2, 2004, on the question submitted by the
board of county commissioners of Sedgwick county for the purpose of
increasing its countywide retailers' sales tax by 1% is hereby declared
valid, and the revenue received therefrom by the county shall be used only
to pay the costs of: (i) Acquisition of a site and constructing and equipping
thereon a new regional events center, associated parking and infrastructure
improvements and related appurtenances thereto, to be located in the
downtown area of the city of Wichita, Kansas, (the "downtown arena");
(ii) design for the Kansas coliseum complex and construction of
improvements to the pavilions; and (iii) establishing an operating and
maintenance reserve for the downtown arena and the Kansas coliseum
complex. The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall commence on
July 1, 2005, and shall terminate not later than 30 months after the

HB 2004—Am. by SC 3
commencement thereof.
(D) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the result of the
election held on August 5, 2008, on the question submitted by the board of
county commissioners of Lyon county for the purpose of increasing its
countywide retailers' sales tax by 1% is hereby declared valid, and the
revenue received therefrom by the county shall be expended for the
purposes of ad valorem tax reduction and capital outlay. The tax imposed
pursuant to this paragraph shall terminate not later than five years after the
commencement thereof.
(E) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the result of the
election held on August 5, 2008, on the question submitted by the board of
county commissioners of Rawlins county for the purpose of increasing its
countywide retailers' sales tax by 0.75% is hereby declared valid, and the
revenue received therefrom by the county shall be expended for the
purposes of financing the costs of a swimming pool. The tax imposed
pursuant to this paragraph shall terminate not later than 15 years after the
commencement thereof or upon payment of all costs authorized pursuant
to this paragraph in the financing of such project.
(F) The result of the election held on December 1, 2009, on the
question submitted by the board of county commissioners of Chautauqua
county for the purpose of increasing its countywide retailers' sales tax by
1% is hereby declared valid, and the revenue received from such tax by the
county shall be expended for the purposes of financing the costs of
constructing, furnishing and equipping a county jail and law enforcement
center and necessary improvements appurtenant to such jail and law
enforcement center. Any tax imposed pursuant to authority granted in this
paragraph shall terminate upon payment of all costs authorized pursuant to
this paragraph incurred in the financing of the project described in this
paragraph.
(G) The result of the election held on April 7, 2015, on the question
submitted by the board of county commissioners of Bourbon county for
the purpose of increasing its retailers' sales tax by 0.4% is hereby declared
valid, and the revenue received therefrom by the county shall be expended
solely for the purpose of financing the costs of constructing, furnishing
and operating a courthouse, law enforcement center or jail facility
improvements. Any tax imposed pursuant to authority granted in this
paragraph shall terminate upon payment of all costs authorized pursuant to
this paragraph incurred in the financing of the project described in this
paragraph.
(H)(B) The result of the election held on November 7, 2017, on the
question submitted by the board of county commissioners of Finney
county for the purpose of increasing its countywide retailers' sales tax by
0.3% is hereby declared valid, and the revenues of such tax shall be used

HB 2004—Am. by SC 4
by Finney county and the city of Garden City, Kansas, as agreed in an
interlocal cooperation agreement between the city and county, and as
detailed in the ballot question approved by voters. The tax imposed
pursuant to this subparagraph shall be levied for a period of 15 years from
the date it is first levied.
(I)(C) The result of the election held on November 3, 2020, on the
question submitted by the board of county commissioners of Cherokee
county for the purpose of increasing its retailers' sales tax by 0.5% is
hereby declared valid, and the revenue received therefrom by the county
shall be expended solely for the purpose of financing: (i) Ambulance
services within the county; (ii) renovations and maintenance of county
buildings and facilities; or (iii) any other projects within the county
deemed necessary by the governing body of Cherokee county. The tax
imposed pursuant to this subparagraph shall terminate prior to January 1,
2033.
(4) The board of county commissioners of Finney and Ford counties
may submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at
the rate of 0.25% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the
purpose of financing all or any portion of the cost to be paid by Finney or
Ford county for construction of highway projects identified as system
enhancements under the provisions of K.S.A. 68-2314(b)(5), and
amendments thereto, to the electors at an election called and held thereon.
Such election shall be called and held in the manner provided by the
general bond law. The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire
upon the payment of all costs authorized pursuant to this paragraph in the
financing of such highway projects. Nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to allow the rate of tax imposed by Finney or Ford county
pursuant to this paragraph to exceed the maximum rate prescribed in
K.S.A. 12-189, and amendments thereto. If any funds remain upon the
payment of all costs authorized pursuant to this paragraph in the financing
of such highway projects in Finney county, the state treasurer shall remit
such funds to the treasurer of Finney county and upon receipt of such
moneys shall be deposited to the credit of the county road and bridge fund.
If any funds remain upon the payment of all costs authorized pursuant to
this paragraph in the financing of such highway projects in Ford county,
the state treasurer shall remit such funds to the treasurer of Ford county
and upon receipt of such moneys shall be deposited to the credit of the
county road and bridge fund.
(5) The board of county commissioners of any county may submit the
question of imposing a retailers' sales tax at the rate of 0.25%, 0.5%,
0.75% or 1% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose
of financing the provision of health care services, as enumerated in the
question, to the electors at an election called and held thereon. Whenever

HB 2004—Am. by SC 5
any county imposes a tax pursuant to this paragraph, any tax imposed
pursuant to subsection (a)(2) by any city located in such county shall
expire upon the effective date of the imposition of the countywide tax, and
thereafter the state treasurer shall remit to each such city that portion of the
countywide tax revenue collected by retailers within such city as certified
by the director of taxation. The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph
shall be deemed to be in addition to the rate limitations prescribed in
K.S.A. 12-189, and amendments thereto. As used in this paragraph, health
care services shall include, but not be limited to, the following: Local
health departments, city or county hospitals, city or county nursing homes,
preventive health care services including immunizations, prenatal care and
the postponement of entry into nursing homes by home care services,
mental health services, indigent health care, physician or health care
worker recruitment, health education, emergency medical services, rural
health clinics, integration of health care services, home health services and
rural health networks.
(6) The board of county commissioners of Allen county may submit
the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate of
0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of operation and construction of a solid waste disposal
area or the modification of an existing landfill to comply with federal
regulations to the electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax
imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire upon the payment of all
costs incurred in the financing of the project undertaken. Nothing in this
paragraph shall be construed to allow the rate of tax imposed by Allen
county pursuant to this paragraph to exceed or be imposed at any rate other
than the rates prescribed in K.S.A. 12-189, and amendments thereto.
(7) (A) The board of county commissioners of Clay and Miami
county may submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales
tax at the rate of 0.50% in the case of Clay county and at a rate of up to 1%
in the case of Miami county, and pledging the revenue received therefrom
for the purpose of financing the costs of roadway construction and
improvement to the electors at an election called and held thereon. Except
as otherwise provided, the tax imposed pursuant to this subparagraph shall
expire after five years from the date such tax is first collected. The result
of the election held on November 2, 2004, on the question submitted by
the board of county commissioners of Miami county for the purpose of
extending for an additional five-year period the countywide retailers' sales
tax imposed pursuant to this subsection in Miami county is hereby
declared valid. The countywide retailers' sales tax imposed pursuant to this
subsection in Clay and Miami county may be extended or reenacted for
additional five-year periods upon the board of county commissioners of
Clay and Miami county submitting such question to the electors at an

HB 2004—Am. by SC 6
election called and held thereon for each additional five-year period as
provided by law.
(B) The board of county commissioners of Dickinson county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of roadway construction and improvement to the
electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant
to this subparagraph shall expire after 10 years from the date such tax is
first collected.
(8) The board of county commissioners of Sherman county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 1% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of street and roadway improvements to the electors at
an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant to this
paragraph shall expire upon payment of all costs authorized pursuant to
this paragraph in the financing of such project.
(9) (A) The board of county commissioners of Cowley, Crawford and
Woodson county may submit the question of imposing a countywide
retailers' sales tax at the rate of 0.5% in the case of Crawford and Woodson
county and at a rate of up to 0.25%, in the case of Cowley county and
pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of financing
economic development initiatives or public infrastructure projects. The tax
imposed pursuant to this subparagraph shall expire after five years from
the date such tax is first collected.
(B) The board of county commissioners of Russell county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing economic development initiatives or public infrastructure
projects. The tax imposed pursuant to this subparagraph shall expire after
10 years from the date such tax is first collected.
(10) The board of county commissioners of Franklin county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.25% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing recreational facilities. The tax imposed pursuant to this
paragraph shall expire upon payment of all costs authorized in financing
such facilities.
(11) The board of county commissioners of Douglas county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.25% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purposes of
conservation, access and management of open space; preservation of
cultural heritage; and economic development projects and activities.
(12) The board of county commissioners of Shawnee county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate

HB 2004—Am. by SC 7
of 0.25% and pledging the revenue received therefrom to the city of
Topeka for the purpose of financing the costs of rebuilding the Topeka
boulevard bridge and other public infrastructure improvements associated
with such project to the electors at an election called and held thereon. The
tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire upon payment of all
costs authorized in financing such project.
(13) The board of county commissioners of Jackson county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at a rate
of 0.4% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing public infrastructure projects to the electors at an election called
and held thereon. Such tax shall expire after seven years from the date
such tax is first collected.
(14) The board of county commissioners of Neosho county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of roadway construction and improvement to the
electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant
to this paragraph shall expire upon payment of all costs authorized
pursuant to this paragraph in the financing of such project.
(15) The board of county commissioners of Saline county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of up to 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose
of financing the costs of construction and operation of an expo center to
the electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed
pursuant to this paragraph shall expire after five years from the date such
tax is first collected.
(16) The board of county commissioners of Harvey county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 1.0% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of property tax relief, economic development initiatives
and public infrastructure improvements to the electors at an election called
and held thereon.
(17) The board of county commissioners of Atchison county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.25% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of construction and maintenance of sports and
recreational facilities to the electors at an election called and held thereon.
The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire upon payment of
all costs authorized in financing such facilities.
(18) The board of county commissioners of Wabaunsee county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of bridge and roadway construction and improvement

HB 2004—Am. by SC 8
to the electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed
pursuant to this paragraph shall expire after 15 years from the date such
tax is first collected. On and after July 1, 2019, the countywide retailers'
sales tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph may be extended or reenacted
for one additional period not to exceed 15 years upon the board of county
commissioners of Wabaunsee county submitting such question to the
electors at an election called and held thereon as provided by law. For any
countywide retailers' sales tax that is extended or reenacted pursuant to this
paragraph, such tax shall expire not later than 15 years from the date such
tax is first collected.
(19) The board of county commissioners of Jefferson county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 1% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of roadway construction and improvement to the
electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant
to this paragraph shall expire after six years from the date such tax is first
collected. The countywide retailers' sales tax imposed pursuant to this
paragraph may be extended or reenacted for additional six-year periods
upon the board of county commissioners of Jefferson county submitting
such question to the electors at an election called and held thereon for each
additional six-year period as provided by law.
(20) The board of county commissioners of Riley county may submit
the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate of up
to 1% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of bridge and roadway construction and improvement
to the electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed
pursuant to this paragraph shall expire after five years from the date such
tax is first collected.
(21) The board of county commissioners of Johnson county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.25% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the construction and operation costs of public safety projects,
including, but not limited to, a jail, detention center, sheriff's resource
center, crime lab or other county administrative or operational facility
dedicated to public safety, to the electors at an election called and held
thereon. The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire after 10
years from the date such tax is first collected. The countywide retailers'
sales tax imposed pursuant to this subsection may be extended or
reenacted for additional periods not exceeding 10 years upon the board of
county commissioners of Johnson county submitting such question to the
electors at an election called and held thereon for each additional ten-year
period as provided by law.
(22) The board of county commissioners of Wilson county may

HB 2004—Am. by SC 9
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of up to 1% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose
of financing the costs of roadway construction and improvements to
federal highways, the development of a new industrial park and other
public infrastructure improvements to the electors at an election called and
held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire upon
payment of all costs authorized pursuant to this paragraph in the financing
of such project or projects.
(23) The board of county commissioners of Butler county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of either 0.25%, 0.5%, 0.75% or 1% and pledging the revenue received
therefrom for the purpose of financing the costs of public safety capital
projects or bridge and roadway construction projects, or both, to the
electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant
to this paragraph shall expire upon payment of all costs authorized in
financing such projects.
(24) The board of county commissioners of Barton county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of up to 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose
of financing the costs of roadway and bridge construction and
improvement and infrastructure development and improvement to the
electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant
to this paragraph shall expire after 10 years from the date such tax is first
collected.
(25) The board of county commissioners of Jefferson county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.25% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of the county's obligation as participating employer to
make employer contributions and other required contributions to the
Kansas public employees retirement system for eligible employees of the
county who are members of the Kansas police and firemen's retirement
system, to the electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax
imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire upon payment of all costs
authorized in financing such purpose.
(26) The board of county commissioners of Pottawatomie county
may submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at
the rate of up to 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the
purpose of financing the costs of construction or remodeling of a
courthouse, jail, law enforcement center facility or other county
administrative facility, or public infrastructure improvements, or both, to
the electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed
pursuant to this paragraph shall expire upon payment of all costs
authorized in financing such project or projects.

HB 2004—Am. by SC 10
(27) The board of county commissioners of Kingman county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.25%, 0.5%, 0.75% or 1% and pledging the revenue received
therefrom for the purpose of financing the costs of constructing and
furnishing a law enforcement center and jail facility and the costs of
roadway and bridge improvements to the electors at an election called and
held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire not
later than 20 years from the date such tax is first collected.
(28) The board of county commissioners of Edwards county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.375% and pledging the revenue therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of economic development initiatives to the electors at
an election called and held thereon.
(29) The board of county commissioners of Rooks county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.5% and pledging the revenue therefrom for the purpose of financing
the costs of constructing or remodeling and furnishing a jail facility to the
electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant
to this paragraph shall expire upon the payment of all costs authorized in
financing such project or projects.
(30) The board of county commissioners of Douglas county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the construction or remodeling of a courthouse, jail, law
enforcement center facility, detention facility or other county
administrative facility, specifically including mental health and for the
operation thereof.
(31) The board of county commissioners of Bourbon county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of up to 1%, in increments of 0.05%, and pledging the revenue received
therefrom for the purpose of financing the costs of constructing, furnishing
and operating a courthouse, law enforcement center or jail facility
improvements to the electors at an election called and held thereon.
(32) The board of county commissioners of Marion county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of property tax relief, economic development initiatives
and the construction of public infrastructure improvements, including
buildings, to the electors at an election called and held thereon.
(33) The board of county commissioners of Wilson county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.25%, 0.5%, 0.75% or 1% and pledging the revenue received
therefrom for the purpose of supporting emergency medical and

HB 2004—Am. by SC 11
ambulance services in the county to the electors at an election called and
held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire after
10 years from the date such tax is first collected. The countywide retailers'
sales tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph may be extended or reenacted
for additional periods not exceeding 10 years per period upon the board of
county commissioners of Wilson county submitting such question to the
electors at an election called and held thereon for each additional period as
provided by law. This paragraph shall not be construed to cause the
expiration, repeal or termination of any existing city retailers' sales tax for
health care services as defined in paragraph (5).
(34) The board of county commissioners of Atchison county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of up to 1% and pledging the revenue received for the purpose of joint law
enforcement communications and solid waste disposal in Atchison county
to the electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax imposed
pursuant to this paragraph shall expire after 10 years from the date such
tax is first collected.
(35) The board of county commissioners of Dickinson county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.25% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of public safety capital projects to the electors at an
election called and held thereon. The tax imposed pursuant to this
paragraph shall expire after five years from the date such tax is first
collected. The countywide retailers' sales tax imposed pursuant to this
paragraph may be extended or reenacted for additional five-year periods
upon the board of county commissioners of Dickinson county submitting
such question to the electors at an election called and held thereon for each
additional five-year period as provided by law.
(36) The board of county commissioners of Rawlins county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of up to 1% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose
of financing the costs of construction, remodeling, capital improvements
or maintenance of attendance centers or other district facilities of any
school district or school districts within the county. The tax imposed
pursuant to this paragraph shall expire upon payment of all costs
authorized in financing the costs of attendance centers or other district
facilities for U.S.D. No. 105.
(37) The board of county commissioners of Marshall county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of up to 1% and pledging the revenue therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of constructing or remodeling and furnishing a jail
facility to the electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax
imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire upon the payment of all

HB 2004—Am. by SC 12
costs authorized in financing such project or projects.
(38) The board of county commissioners of Neosho county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the rate
of 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose of
financing the costs of roadway and bridge construction, maintenance and
improvement to the electors at an election called and held thereon. The tax
imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire after 10 years from the
date such tax is first collected.
(39) The board of county commissioners of Seward county may
submit the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax at the
rate of 0.5% and pledging the revenue received therefrom for the purpose
of financing the costs of roadway and bridge construction, maintenance
and improvement to the electors at an election called and held thereon.
The tax imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall expire after 10 years
from the date such tax is first collected. The countywide retailers' sales tax
imposed pursuant to this paragraph may be extended or reenacted for
additional 10-year periods upon the board of county commissioners of
Seward county submitting such question to the electors at an election
called and held thereon for each additional 10-year period as provided by
law.
(c) The boards of county commissioners of any two or more
contiguous counties, upon adoption of a joint resolution by such boards,
may submit the question of imposing a retailers' sales tax within such
counties to the electors of such counties at an election called and held
thereon and such boards of any two or more contiguous counties shall be
required to submit such question upon submission of a petition in each of
such counties, signed by a number of electors of each of such counties
where submitted equal in number to not less than 10% of the electors of
each of such counties who voted at the last preceding general election for
the office of secretary of state, or upon receiving resolutions requesting
such an election passed by not less than 2/ of the membership of the

governing body of each of one or more cities within each of such counties
that contains a population of not less than 25% of the entire population of
each of such counties, or upon receiving resolutions requesting such an
election passed by 2/ of the membership of the governing body of each of

one or more taxing subdivisions within each of such counties that levy not
less than 25% of the property taxes levied by all taxing subdivisions within
each of such counties.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including
subsection (b)(5), any city retailers' sales tax being levied by a city prior to
July 1, 2006, shall continue in effect until repealed in the manner provided
herein for the adoption and approval of such tax or until repealed by the
adoption of an ordinance for such repeal. Any countywide retailers' sales

HB 2004—Am. by SC 13
tax in the amount of 0.5% or 1% in effect on July 1, 1990, shall continue
in effect until repealed in the manner provided herein for the adoption and
approval of such tax.
(e) Any city or county proposing to adopt a retailers' sales tax shall
give notice of its intention to submit such proposition for approval by the
electors in the manner required by K.S.A. 10-120, and amendments
thereto. The notices shall state the time of the election and the rate and
effective date of the proposed tax. If a majority of the electors voting
thereon at such election fail to approve the proposition, such proposition
may be resubmitted under the conditions and in the manner provided in
this act for submission of the proposition. If a majority of the electors
voting thereon at such election shall approve the levying of such tax, the
governing body of any such city or county shall provide by ordinance or
resolution, as the case may be, for the levy of the tax. Any repeal of such
tax or any reduction or increase in the rate thereof, within the limits
prescribed by K.S.A. 12-189, and amendments thereto, shall be
accomplished in the manner provided herein for the adoption and approval
of such tax except that the repeal of any such city retailers' sales tax may
be accomplished by the adoption of an ordinance so providing.
(f) The sufficiency of the number of signers of any petition filed
under this section shall be determined by the county election officer. Every
election held under this act shall be conducted by the county election
officer.
(g) (1) The governing body of the city or county proposing to levy
any retailers' sales tax shall specify the purpose or purposes for which the
revenue would be used, and a statement generally describing such purpose
or purposes shall be included as a part of the ballot proposition.
(2) In addition to the requirements set forth in paragraph (1), the
governing body of the county proposing to levy a countywide retailers'
sales tax shall include as a part of the ballot proposition whether:
(A) The apportionment formula provided in K.S.A. 12-192, and
amendments thereto, will apply to the revenue;
(B) an interlocal agreement was entered whereby the county will
retain either all or part of the revenue; or
(C) pursuant to law, the county retains the revenue in its entirety.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-189 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 12-189. The rate of any city retailers' sales tax shall be fixed in
increments of 0.05% and in an amount not to exceed 2% for general
purposes and not to exceed 1% for special purposes, which shall be
determined by the governing body of the city. For any retailers' sales tax
imposed by a city for special purposes, such city shall specify the purposes
for which such tax is imposed. All such special purpose retailers' sales
taxes imposed by a city shall expire after 10 years from the date such tax is

HB 2004—Am. by SC 14
first collected. The rate of any countywide retailers' sales tax shall be fixed
in an amount not to exceed 1% and shall be fixed in increments of 0.25%,
and which amount shall be determined by the board of county
commissioners, except that:
(a) The board of county commissioners of Wabaunsee county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(2), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at 1.25%; the board of county commissioners of Osage or Reno
county, for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(2), and amendments thereto,
may fix such rate at 1.25% or 1.5%; the board of county commissioners of
Cherokee, Crawford, Ford, Saline, Seward or Wyandotte county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(2), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at 1.5%; the board of county commissioners of Atchison or Thomas
county, for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(2), and amendments thereto,
may fix such rate at 1.5% or 1.75%; the board of county commissioners of
Anderson, Barton, Jefferson or Ottawa county, for the purposes of K.S.A.
12-187(b)(2), and amendments thereto, may fix such rate at 2%; the board
of county commissioners of Marion county, for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-
187(b)(2), and amendments thereto, may fix such rate at 2.5%; the board
of county commissioners of Franklin, Linn and Miami counties, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(2), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate allowed to be
imposed by the respective board of county commissioners on July 1, 2007,
plus up to 1.0%; and the board of county commissioners of Brown or
Grant county, for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(2), and amendments
thereto, may fix such rate at up to 2%;
(b) the board of county commissioners of Jackson county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(3), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at 2%;
(c) the boards of county commissioners of Finney and Ford counties,
for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(4), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at 0.25%;
(d)(c) the board of county commissioners of any county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(5), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate allowed to be
imposed by a board of county commissioners on the effective date of this
act plus 0.25%, 0.5%, 0.75% or 1%, as the case requires;
(e)(d) the board of county commissioners of Dickinson county, for
the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(7), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at 1.5%, and the board of county commissioners of Miami
county, for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(7), and amendments thereto,
may fix such rate at 1.25%, 1.5%, 1.75% or 2%;
(f)(e) the board of county commissioners of Sherman county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(8), and amendments thereto, may fix such

HB 2004—Am. by SC 15
rate at 2.25%;
(g)(f) the board of county commissioners of Crawford or Russell
county for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(9), and amendments thereto,
may fix such rate at 1.5%;
(h)(g) the board of county commissioners of Franklin county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(10), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at 1.75%;
(i)(h) the board of county commissioners of Douglas county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(11) and (b)(30), and amendments thereto,
may fix such rate at 1.75%;
(j)(i) the board of county commissioners of Jackson county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(13), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at 1.4%;
(k) the board of county commissioners of Sedgwick county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(3)(C), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at 2%;
(l)(j) the board of county commissioners of Neosho county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(14), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at 1.0% or 1.5%;
(m)(k) the board of county commissioners of Saline county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(15), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at up to 1.5%;
(n)(l) the board of county commissioners of Harvey county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(16), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at 2.0%;
(o)(m) the board of county commissioners of Atchison county, for the
purpose of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(17), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate allowed to be
imposed by the board of county commissioners of Atchison county on the
effective date of this act plus 0.25%;
(p)(n) the board of county commissioners of Wabaunsee county, for
the purpose of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(18), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate allowed to be
imposed by the board of county commissioners of Wabaunsee county on
July 1, 2007, plus 0.5%;
(q)(o) the board of county commissioners of Jefferson county, for the
purpose of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(19) and (25), and amendments thereto, may
fix such rate at 2.25%;
(r)(p) the board of county commissioners of Riley county, for the
purpose of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(20), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate allowed to be
imposed by the board of county commissioners of Riley county on July 1,
2007, plus up to 1%;

HB 2004—Am. by SC 16
(s)(q) the board of county commissioners of Johnson county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(21), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate allowed to be
imposed by the board of county commissioners of Johnson county on July
1, 2007, plus 0.25%;
(t)(r) the board of county commissioners of Wilson county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(22), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at up to 2%;
(u)(s) the board of county commissioners of Butler county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(23), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate otherwise allowed
pursuant to this section, plus 0.25%, 0.5%, 0.75% or 1%;
(v)(t) the board of county commissioners of Barton county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(24), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at up to 1.5%;
(w) the board of county commissioners of Lyon county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(3)(D), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at 1.5%;
(x) the board of county commissioners of Rawlins county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(3)(E), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at 1.75%;
(y) the board of county commissioners of Chautauqua county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(3)(F), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at 2.0%;
(z)(u) the board of county commissioners of Pottawatomie county, for
the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(26), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at up to 1.5%;
(aa)(v) the board of county commissioners of Kingman county, for
the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(27), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate otherwise
allowed pursuant to this section, plus 0.25%, 0.5%, 0.75%, or 1%;
(bb)(w) the board of county commissioners of Edwards county, for
the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(28), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at 1.375%;
(cc)(x) the board of county commissioners of Rooks county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(29), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at up to 1.5%;
(dd)(y) the board of county commissioners of Bourbon county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(3)(G) 12-187(b)(3)(A) and (b)(31), and
amendments thereto, may fix such rate at up to 2.0%;
(ee)(z) the board of county commissioners of Marion county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(32), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at 2.5%;

HB 2004—Am. by SC 17
( ff) (aa) the board of county commissioners of Finney county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(3)(H) 12-187(b)(3)(B), and amendments
thereto, may fix such rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the
rate otherwise allowed pursuant to this section, plus 0.3%;
(gg)(bb) the board of county commissioners of Cherokee county, for
the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(3)(I) 12-187(b)(3)(C), and amendments
thereto, may fix such rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the
rate otherwise allowed pursuant to this section, plus 0.5%;
(hh)(cc) the board of county commissioners of Wilson county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(33), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate otherwise allowed
pursuant to this section, plus 0.25%, 0.5%, 0.75% or 1%;
(ii)(dd) the board of county commissioners of Atchison county, for
the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(34), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate otherwise
allowed pursuant to this section, plus up to 1%;
(jj)(ee) the board of county commissioners of Dickinson county, for
the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(35), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate otherwise
allowed pursuant to this section, plus 0.25%;
(kk)(ff) the board of county commissioners of Rawlins county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(36), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate otherwise allowed
pursuant to this section, plus up to 1%;
(ll)(gg) the board of county commissioners of Marshall county, for
the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(37), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate otherwise
allowed pursuant to this section, plus up to 1%; and
(mm)(hh) the board of county commissioners of Neosho county, for
the purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(38), and amendments thereto, may fix
such rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate otherwise
allowed pursuant to this section, plus 0.5%; and
(nn)(ii) the board of county commissioners of Seward county, for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-187(b)(39), and amendments thereto, may fix such
rate at a percentage that is equal to the sum of the rate otherwise allowed
pursuant to this section, plus 0.5%.
Any county or city levying a retailers' sales tax is hereby prohibited
from administering or collecting such tax locally, but shall utilize the
services of the state department of revenue to administer, enforce and
collect such tax. Except as otherwise specifically provided in K.S.A. 12-
189a, and amendments thereto, such tax shall be identical in its
application, and exemptions therefrom, to the Kansas retailers' sales tax act
and all laws and administrative rules and regulations of the state

HB 2004—Am. by SC 18
department of revenue relating to the Kansas retailers' sales tax shall apply
to such local sales tax insofar as such laws and rules and regulations may
be made applicable. The state director of taxation is hereby authorized to
administer, enforce and collect such local sales taxes and to adopt such
rules and regulations as may be necessary for the efficient and effective
administration and enforcement thereof.
Upon receipt of a certified copy of an ordinance or resolution
authorizing the levy of a local retailers' sales tax, the director of taxation
shall cause such taxes to be collected within or without the boundaries of
such taxing subdivision at the same time and in the same manner provided
for the collection of the state retailers' sales tax. Such copy shall be
submitted to the director of taxation within 30 days after adoption of any
such ordinance or resolution. The director of taxation shall confirm that all
provisions of law applicable to the authorization of local sales tax have
been followed prior to causing the collection. If the director of taxation
discovers that a city or county did not comply with any provision of law
applicable to the authorization of a local sales tax after collection has
commenced, the director shall immediately notify the city or county and
cease collection of such sales tax until such noncompliance is remedied.
All moneys collected by the director of taxation under the provisions of
this section shall be credited to a county and city retailers' sales tax fund
which fund is hereby established in the state treasury, except that all
moneys collected by the director of taxation pursuant to the authority
granted in K.S.A. 12-187(b)(22), and amendments thereto, shall be
credited to the Wilson county capital improvements fund. Any refund due
on any county or city retailers' sales tax collected pursuant to this act shall
be paid out of the sales tax refund fund and reimbursed by the director of
taxation from collections of local retailers' sales tax revenue. Except for
local retailers' sales tax revenue required to be deposited in the
redevelopment bond fund established under K.S.A. 74-8927, and
amendments thereto, all local retailers' sales tax revenue collected within
any county or city pursuant to this act shall be apportioned and remitted at
least quarterly by the state treasurer, on instruction from the director of
taxation, to the treasurer of such county or city.
Revenue that is received from the imposition of a local retailers' sales
tax that exceeds the amount of revenue required to pay the costs of a
special project for which such revenue was pledged shall be credited to the
city or county general fund, as the case requires.
The director of taxation shall provide, upon request by a city or county
clerk or treasurer or finance officer of any city or county levying a local
retailers' sales tax, monthly reports identifying each retailer doing business
in such city or county or making taxable sales sourced to such city or
county, setting forth the tax liability and the amount of such tax remitted

HB 2004—Am. by SC 19
by each retailer during the preceding month and identifying each business
location maintained by the retailer and such retailer's sales or use tax
registration or account number. Such report shall be made available to the
clerk or treasurer or finance officer of such city or county within a
reasonable time after it has been requested from the director of taxation.
The director of taxation shall be allowed to assess a reasonable fee for the
issuance of such report. Information received by any city or county
pursuant to this section shall be confidential, and it shall be unlawful for
any officer or employee of such city or county to divulge any such
information in any manner. Any violation of this paragraph by a city or
county officer or employee is a class A misdemeanor, and such officer or
employee shall be dismissed from office. Reports of violations of this
paragraph shall be investigated by the attorney general. The district
attorney or county attorney and the attorney general shall have authority to
prosecute violations of this paragraph.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-192 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 12-192. (a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b), (d) or
(h), all revenue received by the director of taxation from a countywide
retailers' sales tax shall be apportioned among the county and each city
located in such county in the following manner:
(1) 1/ of all revenue received by the director of taxation shall be

apportioned among the county and each city located in such county in the
proportion that the total tangible property tax levies made in such county
in the preceding year for all funds of each such governmental unit bear to
the total of all such levies made in the preceding year; and
(2) 1/ of all revenue received by the director of taxation from such

countywide retailers' sales tax shall be apportioned among the county and
each city located in such county, first to the county that portion of the
revenue equal to the proportion that the population of the county residing
in the unincorporated area of the county bears to the total population of the
county, and second to the cities in the proportion that the population of
each city bears to the total population of the county, except that no persons
residing within the Fort Riley military reservation shall be included in the
determination of the population of any city located within Riley county.
All revenue apportioned to a county shall be paid to its county treasurer
and shall be credited to the general fund of the county.
(b) (1) In lieu of the apportionment formula provided in subsection
(a), all revenue received by the director of taxation from a countywide
retailers' sales tax imposed within Johnson county at the rate of 0.75%, 1%
or 1.25% after July 1, 2007, shall be apportioned among the county and
each city located in such county in the following manner:
(A) The revenue received from the first 0.5% rate of tax shall be
apportioned in the manner prescribed by subsection (a); and

HB 2004—Am. by SC 20
(B) the revenue received from the rate of tax exceeding 0.5% shall be
apportioned as follows:
(i) 1/ shall be apportioned among the county and each city located in

such county in the proportion that the total tangible property tax levies
made in such county in the preceding year for all funds of each such
governmental unit bear to the total of all such levies made in the preceding
year;
(ii) 1/ shall be apportioned among the county and each city located in

such county, first to the county that portion of the revenue equal to the
proportion that the population of the county residing in the unincorporated
area of the county bears to the total population of the county, and second to
the cities in the proportion that the population of each city bears to the
total population of the county; and
(iii) 1/ shall be retained by the county for its sole use and benefit.

(2) In lieu of the apportionment formula provided in subsection (a),
all money received by the director of taxation from a countywide sales tax
imposed within Montgomery county pursuant to the election held on
November 8, 1994, shall be remitted to and shall be retained by the county
and expended only for the purpose for which the revenue received from
the tax was pledged. All revenue apportioned and paid from the imposition
of such tax to the treasurer of any city prior to the effective date of this act
shall be remitted to the county treasurer and expended only for the purpose
for which the revenue received from the tax was pledged.
(3) In lieu of the apportionment formula provided in subsection (a),
on and after the effective date of this act, all moneys received by the
director of taxation from a countywide retailers' sales tax imposed within
Phillips county pursuant to the election held on September 20, 2005, shall
be remitted to and shall be retained by the county and expended only for
the purpose for which the revenue received from the tax was pledged.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided by paragraph (2) of this
subsection, for purposes of subsections (a) and (b), the term "total tangible
property tax levies" means the aggregate dollar amount of tax revenue
derived from ad valorem tax levies applicable to all tangible property
located within each such city or county. The ad valorem property tax levy
of any county or city district entity or subdivision shall be included within
this term if the levy of any such district entity or subdivision is applicable
to all tangible property located within each such city or county.
(2) For the purposes of subsections (a) and (b), any ad valorem
property tax levied on property located in a city in Johnson county for the
purpose of providing fire protection service in such city shall be included
within the term "total tangible property tax levies" for such city regardless
of its applicability to all tangible property located within each such city. If
the tax is levied by a district which extends across city boundaries, for

HB 2004—Am. by SC 21
purposes of this computation, the amount of such levy shall be apportioned
among each city in which such district extends in the proportion that such
tax levied within each city bears to the total tax levied by the district.
(d) (1) All revenue received from a countywide retailers' sales tax
imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 12-187(b)(2), (3)(A), (3)(C), (3)(F), (3)(G),
(3)(I), (6), (7), (8), (9), (12), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (22),
(23), (25), (27), (28), (29), (30), (31), (32), (33), (34), (35), (36), (37) and,
(38) and (39), and amendments thereto, shall be remitted to and shall be
retained by the county and expended only for the purpose for which the
revenue received from the tax was pledged.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in K.S.A. 12-187(b)(5), and
amendments thereto, all revenues received from a countywide retailers'
sales tax imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 12-187(b)(5), and amendments
thereto, shall be remitted to and shall be retained by the county and
expended only for the purpose for which the revenue received from the tax
was pledged.
(3) All revenue received from a countywide retailers' sales tax
imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 12-187(b)(26), and amendments thereto, shall
be remitted to and shall be retained by the county and expended only for
the purpose for which the revenue received from the tax was pledged
unless the question of imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax authorized
by K.S.A. 12-187(b)(26), and amendments thereto, includes the
apportionment of revenue prescribed in subsection (a).
(e) All revenue apportioned to the several cities of the county shall be
paid to the respective treasurers thereof and deposited in the general fund
of the city. Whenever the territory of any city is located in two or more
counties and any one or more of such counties do not levy a countywide
retailers' sales tax, or whenever such counties do not levy countywide
retailers' sales taxes at a uniform rate, the revenue received by such city
from the proceeds of the countywide retailers' sales tax, as an alternative to
depositing the same in the general fund, may be used for the purpose of
reducing the tax levies of such city upon the taxable tangible property
located within the county levying such countywide retailers' sales tax.
(f) Prior to March 1 of each year, the secretary of revenue shall advise
each county treasurer of the revenue collected in such county from the
state retailers' sales tax for the preceding calendar year.
(g) Prior to December 31 of each year, the clerk of every county
imposing a countywide retailers' sales tax shall provide such information
deemed necessary by the secretary of revenue to apportion and remit
revenue to the counties and cities pursuant to this section.
(h) The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) for the apportionment of
countywide retailers' sales tax shall not apply to any revenues received
pursuant to a county or countywide retailers' sales tax levied or collected

HB 2004—Am. by SC 22
under K.S.A. 74-8929, and amendments thereto. All such revenue
collected under K.S.A. 74-8929, and amendments thereto, shall be
deposited into the redevelopment bond fund established by K.S.A. 74-
8927, and amendments thereto, for the period of time set forth in K.S.A.
74-8927, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3606 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 79-3606. The following shall be exempt from the tax imposed by
this act:
(a) All sales of motor-vehicle fuel or other articles upon which a
sales or excise tax has been paid, not subject to refund, under the laws of
this state except cigarettes and electronic cigarettes as defined by K.S.A.
79-3301, and amendments thereto, including consumable material for
such electronic cigarettes, cereal malt beverages and malt products as
defined by K.S.A. 79-3817, and amendments thereto, including wort,
liquid malt, malt syrup and malt extract, that is not subject to taxation
under the provisions of K.S.A. 79-41a02, and amendments thereto,
motor vehicles taxed pursuant to K.S.A. 79-5117, and amendments
thereto, tires taxed pursuant to K.S.A. 65-3424d, and amendments
thereto, drycleaning and laundry services taxed pursuant to K.S.A. 65-
34,150, and amendments thereto, and gross receipts from regulated
sports contests taxed pursuant to the Kansas professional regulated
sports act, and amendments thereto;
(b) all sales of tangible personal property or service, including the
renting and leasing of tangible personal property, purchased directly by
the state of Kansas, a political subdivision thereof, other than a school
or educational institution, or purchased by a public or private nonprofit
hospital, public hospital authority, nonprofit blood, tissue or organ bank
or nonprofit integrated community care organization and used
exclusively for state, political subdivision, hospital, public hospital
authority, nonprofit blood, tissue or organ bank or nonprofit integrated
community care organization purposes, except when: (1) Such state,
hospital or public hospital authority is engaged or proposes to engage in
any business specifically taxable under the provisions of this act and
such items of tangible personal property or service are used or proposed
to be used in such business; or (2) such political subdivision is engaged
or proposes to engage in the business of furnishing gas, electricity or
heat to others and such items of personal property or service are used or
proposed to be used in such business;
(c) all sales of tangible personal property or services, including the
renting and leasing of tangible personal property, purchased directly by
a public or private elementary or secondary school or public or private
nonprofit educational institution and used primarily by such school or
institution for nonsectarian programs and activities provided or

HB 2004—Am. by SC 23
sponsored by such school or institution or in the erection, repair or
enlargement of buildings to be used for such purposes. The exemption
herein provided shall not apply to erection, construction, repair,
enlargement or equipment of buildings used primarily for human
habitation, except that such exemption shall apply to the erection,
construction, repair, enlargement or equipment of buildings used for
human habitation by the cerebral palsy research foundation of Kansas
located in Wichita, Kansas, multi community diversified services,
incorporated, located in McPherson, Kansas, the Kansas state school for
the blind and the Kansas state school for the deaf;
(d) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by
a contractor for the purpose of constructing, equipping, reconstructing,
maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities
for any public or private nonprofit hospital or public hospital authority,
public or private elementary or secondary school, a public or private
nonprofit educational institution, state correctional institution including
a privately constructed correctional institution contracted for state use
and ownership, that would be exempt from taxation under the provisions
of this act if purchased directly by such hospital or public hospital
authority, school, educational institution or a state correctional
institution; and all sales of tangible personal property or services
purchased by a contractor for the purpose of constructing, equipping,
reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling facilities for any political subdivision of the state or district
described in subsection (s), the total cost of which is paid from funds of
such political subdivision or district and that would be exempt from
taxation under the provisions of this act if purchased directly by such
political subdivision or district. Nothing in this subsection or in the
provisions of K.S.A. 12-3418, and amendments thereto, shall be deemed
to exempt the purchase of any construction machinery, equipment or
tools used in the constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining,
repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities for any political
subdivision of the state or any such district. As used in this subsection,
K.S.A. 12-3418 and 79-3640, and amendments thereto, "funds of a
political subdivision" shall mean general tax revenues, the proceeds of
any bonds and gifts or grants-in-aid. Gifts shall not mean funds used for
the purpose of constructing, equipping, reconstructing, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities that are to be leased to the
donor. When any political subdivision of the state, district described in
subsection (s), public or private nonprofit hospital or public hospital
authority, public or private elementary or secondary school, public or
private nonprofit educational institution, state correctional institution
including a privately constructed correctional institution contracted for

HB 2004—Am. by SC 24
state use and ownership shall contract for the purpose of constructing,
equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling facilities, it shall obtain from the state and furnish to the
contractor an exemption certificate for the project involved, and the
contractor may purchase materials for incorporation in such project.
The contractor shall furnish the number of such certificate to all
suppliers from whom such purchases are made, and such suppliers shall
execute invoices covering the same bearing the number of such
certificate. Upon completion of the project the contractor shall furnish
to the political subdivision, district described in subsection (s), hospital
or public hospital authority, school, educational institution or
department of corrections concerned a sworn statement, on a form to be
provided by the director of taxation, that all purchases so made were
entitled to exemption under this subsection. As an alternative to the
foregoing procedure, any such contracting entity may apply to the
secretary of revenue for agent status for the sole purpose of issuing and
furnishing project exemption certificates to contractors pursuant to rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary establishing conditions and
standards for the granting and maintaining of such status. All invoices
shall be held by the contractor for a period of five years and shall be
subject to audit by the director of taxation. If any materials purchased
under such a certificate are found not to have been incorporated in the
building or other project or not to have been returned for credit or the
sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials that
will not be so incorporated in the building or other project reported and
paid by such contractor to the director of taxation not later than the 20th
day of the month following the close of the month in which it shall be
determined that such materials will not be used for the purpose for
which such certificate was issued, the political subdivision, district
described in subsection (s), hospital or public hospital authority, school,
educational institution or the contractor contracting with the department
of corrections for a correctional institution concerned shall be liable for
tax on all materials purchased for the project, and upon payment thereof
it may recover the same from the contractor together with reasonable
attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent, employee or subcontractor
thereof, who shall use or otherwise dispose of any materials purchased
under such a certificate for any purpose other than that for which such
a certificate is issued without the payment of the sales or compensating
tax otherwise imposed upon such materials, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be subject to the
penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and amendments thereto;
(e) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by a
contractor for the erection, repair or enlargement of buildings or other

HB 2004—Am. by SC 25
projects for the government of the United States, its agencies or
instrumentalities, that would be exempt from taxation if purchased
directly by the government of the United States, its agencies or
instrumentalities. When the government of the United States, its
agencies or instrumentalities shall contract for the erection, repair, or
enlargement of any building or other project, it shall obtain from the
state and furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for the
project involved, and the contractor may purchase materials for
incorporation in such project. The contractor shall furnish the number
of such certificates to all suppliers from whom such purchases are made,
and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering the same bearing the
number of such certificate. Upon completion of the project the
contractor shall furnish to the government of the United States, its
agencies or instrumentalities concerned a sworn statement, on a form to
be provided by the director of taxation, that all purchases so made were
entitled to exemption under this subsection. As an alternative to the
foregoing procedure, any such contracting entity may apply to the
secretary of revenue for agent status for the sole purpose of issuing and
furnishing project exemption certificates to contractors pursuant to rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary establishing conditions and
standards for the granting and maintaining of such status. All invoices
shall be held by the contractor for a period of five years and shall be
subject to audit by the director of taxation. Any contractor or any agent,
employee or subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise dispose of
any materials purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other
than that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of
the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials,
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto;
(f) tangible personal property purchased by a railroad or public
utility for consumption or movement directly and immediately in
interstate commerce;
(g) sales of aircraft including remanufactured and modified
aircraft sold to persons using directly or through an authorized agent
such aircraft as certified or licensed carriers of persons or property in
interstate or foreign commerce under authority of the laws of the United
States or any foreign government or sold to any foreign government or
agency or instrumentality of such foreign government and all sales of
aircraft for use outside of the United States and sales of aircraft repair,
modification and replacement parts and sales of services employed in the
remanufacture, modification and repair of aircraft;
(h) all rentals of nonsectarian textbooks by public or private

HB 2004—Am. by SC 26
elementary or secondary schools;
(i) the lease or rental of all films, records, tapes, or any type of
sound or picture transcriptions used by motion picture exhibitors;
(j) meals served without charge or food used in the preparation of
such meals to employees of any restaurant, eating house, dining car,
hotel, drugstore or other place where meals or drinks are regularly sold
to the public if such employees' duties are related to the furnishing or
sale of such meals or drinks;
(k) any motor vehicle, semitrailer or pole trailer, as such terms are
defined by K.S.A. 8-126, and amendments thereto, or aircraft sold and
delivered in this state to a bona fide resident of another state, which
motor vehicle, semitrailer, pole trailer or aircraft is not to be registered
or based in this state and which vehicle, semitrailer, pole trailer or
aircraft will not remain in this state more than 10 days;
(l) all isolated or occasional sales of tangible personal property,
services, substances or things, except isolated or occasional sale of
motor vehicles specifically taxed under the provisions of K.S.A. 79-
3603(o), and amendments thereto;
(m) all sales of tangible personal property that become an
ingredient or component part of tangible personal property or services
produced, manufactured or compounded for ultimate sale at retail
within or without the state of Kansas; and any such producer,
manufacturer or compounder may obtain from the director of taxation
and furnish to the supplier an exemption certificate number for tangible
personal property for use as an ingredient or component part of the
property or services produced, manufactured or compounded;
(n) all sales of tangible personal property that is consumed in the
production, manufacture, processing, mining, drilling, refining or
compounding of tangible personal property, the treating of by-products
or wastes derived from any such production process, the providing of
services or the irrigation of crops for ultimate sale at retail within or
without the state of Kansas; and any purchaser of such property may
obtain from the director of taxation and furnish to the supplier an
exemption certificate number for tangible personal property for
consumption in such production, manufacture, processing, mining,
drilling, refining, compounding, treating, irrigation and in providing
such services;
(o) all sales of animals, fowl and aquatic plants and animals, the
primary purpose of which is use in agriculture or aquaculture, as
defined in K.S.A. 47-1901, and amendments thereto, the production of
food for human consumption, the production of animal, dairy, poultry or
aquatic plant and animal products, fiber or fur, or the production of
offspring for use for any such purpose or purposes;

HB 2004—Am. by SC 27
(p) all sales of drugs dispensed pursuant to a prescription order by
a licensed practitioner or a mid-level practitioner as defined by K.S.A.
65-1626, and amendments thereto. As used in this subsection, "drug"
means a compound, substance or preparation and any component of a
compound, substance or preparation, other than food and food
ingredients, dietary supplements or alcoholic beverages, recognized in
the official United States pharmacopeia, official homeopathic
pharmacopoeia of the United States or official national formulary, and
supplement to any of them, intended for use in the diagnosis, cure,
mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease or intended to affect the
structure or any function of the body, except that for taxable years
commencing after December 31, 2013, this subsection shall not apply to
any sales of drugs used in the performance or induction of an abortion,
as defined in K.S.A. 65-6701, and amendments thereto;
(q) all sales of insulin dispensed by a person licensed by the state
board of pharmacy to a person for treatment of diabetes at the direction
of a person licensed to practice medicine by the state board of healing
arts;
(r) all sales of oxygen delivery equipment, kidney dialysis
equipment, enteral feeding systems, prosthetic devices and mobility
enhancing equipment prescribed in writing by a person licensed to
practice the healing arts, dentistry or optometry, and in addition to such
sales, all sales of hearing aids, as defined by K.S.A. 74-5807(c), and
amendments thereto, and repair and replacement parts therefor,
including batteries, by a person licensed in the practice of dispensing
and fitting hearing aids pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 74-5808,
and amendments thereto. For the purposes of this subsection: (1)
"Mobility enhancing equipment" means equipment including repair
and replacement parts to same, but does not include durable medical
equipment, which is primarily and customarily used to provide or
increase the ability to move from one place to another and which is
appropriate for use either in a home or a motor vehicle; is not generally
used by persons with normal mobility; and does not include any motor
vehicle or equipment on a motor vehicle normally provided by a motor
vehicle manufacturer; and (2) "prosthetic device" means a replacement,
corrective or supportive device including repair and replacement parts
for same worn on or in the body to artificially replace a missing portion
of the body, prevent or correct physical deformity or malfunction or
support a weak or deformed portion of the body;
(s) except as provided in K.S.A. 82a-2101, and amendments thereto,
all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased directly or
indirectly by a groundwater management district organized or operating
under the authority of K.S.A. 82a-1020 et seq., and amendments thereto,

HB 2004—Am. by SC 28
by a rural water district organized or operating under the authority of
K.S.A. 82a-612, and amendments thereto, or by a water supply district
organized or operating under the authority of K.S.A. 19-3501 et seq., 19-
3522 et seq. or 19-3545, and amendments thereto, which property or
services are used in the construction activities, operation or maintenance
of the district;
(t) all sales of farm machinery and equipment or aquaculture
machinery and equipment, repair and replacement parts therefor and
services performed in the repair and maintenance of such machinery
and equipment. For the purposes of this subsection the term "farm
machinery and equipment or aquaculture machinery and equipment"
shall include a work-site utility vehicle, as defined in K.S.A. 8-126, and
amendments thereto, and is equipped with a bed or cargo box for
hauling materials, and shall also include machinery and equipment used
in the operation of Christmas tree farming but shall not include any
passenger vehicle, truck, truck tractor, trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer,
other than a farm trailer, as such terms are defined by K.S.A. 8-126, and
amendments thereto. "Farm machinery and equipment" includes
precision farming equipment that is portable or is installed or purchased
to be installed on farm machinery and equipment. "Precision farming
equipment" includes the following items used only in computer-assisted
farming, ranching or aquaculture production operations: Soil testing
sensors, yield monitors, computers, monitors, software, global
positioning and mapping systems, guiding systems, modems, data
communications equipment and any necessary mounting hardware,
wiring and antennas. Each purchaser of farm machinery and equipment
or aquaculture machinery and equipment exempted herein must certify
in writing on the copy of the invoice or sales ticket to be retained by the
seller that the farm machinery and equipment or aquaculture machinery
and equipment purchased will be used only in farming, ranching or
aquaculture production. Farming or ranching shall include the
operation of a feedlot and farm and ranch work for hire and the
operation of a nursery;
(u) all leases or rentals of tangible personal property used as a
dwelling if such tangible personal property is leased or rented for a
period of more than 28 consecutive days;
(v) all sales of tangible personal property to any contractor for use
in preparing meals for delivery to homebound elderly persons over 60
years of age and to homebound disabled persons or to be served at a
group-sitting at a location outside of the home to otherwise homebound
elderly persons over 60 years of age and to otherwise homebound
disabled persons, as all or part of any food service project funded in
whole or in part by government or as part of a private nonprofit food

HB 2004—Am. by SC 29
service project available to all such elderly or disabled persons residing
within an area of service designated by the private nonprofit
organization, and all sales of tangible personal property for use in
preparing meals for consumption by indigent or homeless individuals
whether or not such meals are consumed at a place designated for such
purpose, and all sales of food products by or on behalf of any such
contractor or organization for any such purpose;
(w) all sales of natural gas, electricity, heat and water delivered
through mains, lines or pipes: (1) To residential premises for
noncommercial use by the occupant of such premises; (2) for
agricultural use and also, for such use, all sales of propane gas; (3) for
use in the severing of oil; and (4) to any property which is exempt from
property taxation pursuant to K.S.A. 79-201b, Second through Sixth. As
used in this paragraph, "severing" means the same as defined in K.S.A.
79-4216(k), and amendments thereto. For all sales of natural gas,
electricity and heat delivered through mains, lines or pipes pursuant to
the provisions of subsection (w)(1) and (w)(2), the provisions of this
subsection shall expire on December 31, 2005;
(x) all sales of propane gas, LP-gas, coal, wood and other fuel
sources for the production of heat or lighting for noncommercial use of
an occupant of residential premises occurring prior to January 1, 2006;
(y) all sales of materials and services used in the repairing,
servicing, altering, maintaining, manufacturing, remanufacturing, or
modification of railroad rolling stock for use in interstate or foreign
commerce under authority of the laws of the United States;
(z) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
directly by a port authority or by a contractor therefor as provided by the
provisions of K.S.A. 12-3418, and amendments thereto;
(aa) all sales of materials and services applied to equipment that is
transported into the state from without the state for repair, service,
alteration, maintenance, remanufacture or modification and that is
subsequently transported outside the state for use in the transmission of
liquids or natural gas by means of pipeline in interstate or foreign
commerce under authority of the laws of the United States;
(bb) all sales of used mobile homes or manufactured homes. As
used in this subsection: (1) "Mobile homes" and "manufactured
homes" mean the same as defined in K.S.A. 58-4202, and amendments
thereto; and (2) "sales of used mobile homes or manufactured homes"
means sales other than the original retail sale thereof;
(cc) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased
prior to January 1, 2012, except as otherwise provided, for the purpose
of and in conjunction with constructing, reconstructing, enlarging or
remodeling a business or retail business that meets the requirements

HB 2004—Am. by SC 30
established in K.S.A. 74-50,115, and amendments thereto, and the sale
and installation of machinery and equipment purchased for installation
at any such business or retail business, and all sales of tangible personal
property or services purchased on or after January 1, 2012, for the
purpose of and in conjunction with constructing, reconstructing,
enlarging or remodeling a business that meets the requirements
established in K.S.A. 74-50,115(e), and amendments thereto, and the
sale and installation of machinery and equipment purchased for
installation at any such business. When a person shall contract for the
construction, reconstruction, enlargement or remodeling of any such
business or retail business, such person shall obtain from the state and
furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for the project
involved, and the contractor may purchase materials, machinery and
equipment for incorporation in such project. The contractor shall
furnish the number of such certificates to all suppliers from whom such
purchases are made, and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering
the same bearing the number of such certificate. Upon completion of the
project the contractor shall furnish to the owner of the business or retail
business a sworn statement, on a form to be provided by the director of
taxation, that all purchases so made were entitled to exemption under
this subsection. All invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period
of five years and shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. Any
contractor or any agent, employee or subcontractor thereof, who shall
use or otherwise dispose of any materials, machinery or equipment
purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other than that for
which such a certificate is issued without the payment of the sales or
compensating tax otherwise imposed thereon, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be subject to the
penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and amendments thereto. As
used in this subsection, "business" and "retail business" mean the same
as defined in K.S.A. 74-50,114, and amendments thereto. Project
exemption certificates that have been previously issued under this
subsection by the department of revenue pursuant to K.S.A. 74-50,115,
and amendments thereto, but not including K.S.A. 74-50,115(e), and
amendments thereto, prior to January 1, 2012, and have not expired will
be effective for the term of the project or two years from the effective
date of the certificate, whichever occurs earlier. Project exemption
certificates that are submitted to the department of revenue prior to
January 1, 2012, and are found to qualify will be issued a project
exemption certificate that will be effective for a two-year period or for
the term of the project, whichever occurs earlier;
(dd) all sales of tangible personal property purchased with food
stamps issued by the United States department of agriculture;

HB 2004—Am. by SC 31
(ee) all sales of lottery tickets and shares made as part of a lottery
operated by the state of Kansas;
(ff) on and after July 1, 1988, all sales of new mobile homes or
manufactured homes to the extent of 40% of the gross receipts,
determined without regard to any trade-in allowance, received from such
sale. As used in this subsection, "mobile homes" and "manufactured
homes" mean the same as defined in K.S.A. 58-4202, and amendments
thereto;
(gg) all sales of tangible personal property purchased in
accordance with vouchers issued pursuant to the federal special
supplemental food program for women, infants and children;
(hh) all sales of medical supplies and equipment, including durable
medical equipment, purchased directly by a nonprofit skilled nursing
home or nonprofit intermediate nursing care home, as defined by K.S.A.
39-923, and amendments thereto, for the purpose of providing medical
services to residents thereof. This exemption shall not apply to tangible
personal property customarily used for human habitation purposes. As
used in this subsection, "durable medical equipment" means equipment
including repair and replacement parts for such equipment, that can
withstand repeated use, is primarily and customarily used to serve a
medical purpose, generally is not useful to a person in the absence of
illness or injury and is not worn in or on the body, but does not include
mobility enhancing equipment as defined in subsection (r), oxygen
delivery equipment, kidney dialysis equipment or enteral feeding
systems;
(ii) all sales of tangible personal property purchased directly by a
nonprofit organization for nonsectarian comprehensive multidiscipline
youth development programs and activities provided or sponsored by
such organization, and all sales of tangible personal property by or on
behalf of any such organization. This exemption shall not apply to
tangible personal property customarily used for human habitation
purposes;
(jj) all sales of tangible personal property or services, including the
renting and leasing of tangible personal property, purchased directly on
behalf of a community-based facility for people with intellectual
disability or mental health center organized pursuant to K.S.A. 19-4001
et seq., and amendments thereto, and licensed in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and amendments thereto, and all
sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by contractors
during the time period from July, 2003, through June, 2006, for the
purpose of constructing, equipping, maintaining or furnishing a new
facility for a community-based facility for people with intellectual
disability or mental health center located in Riverton, Cherokee County,

HB 2004—Am. by SC 32
Kansas, that would have been eligible for sales tax exemption pursuant
to this subsection if purchased directly by such facility or center. This
exemption shall not apply to tangible personal property customarily used
for human habitation purposes;
(kk) (1) (A) all sales of machinery and equipment that are used in
this state as an integral or essential part of an integrated production
operation by a manufacturing or processing plant or facility;
(B) all sales of installation, repair and maintenance services
performed on such machinery and equipment; and
(C) all sales of repair and replacement parts and accessories
purchased for such machinery and equipment.
(2) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) "Integrated production operation" means an integrated series
of operations engaged in at a manufacturing or processing plant or
facility to process, transform or convert tangible personal property by
physical, chemical or other means into a different form, composition or
character from that in which it originally existed. Integrated production
operations shall include: (i) Production line operations, including
packaging operations; (ii) preproduction operations to handle, store and
treat raw materials; (iii) post production handling, storage, warehousing
and distribution operations; and (iv) waste, pollution and environmental
control operations, if any;
(B) "production line" means the assemblage of machinery and
equipment at a manufacturing or processing plant or facility where the
actual transformation or processing of tangible personal property
occurs;
(C) "manufacturing or processing plant or facility" means a single,
fixed location owned or controlled by a manufacturing or processing
business that consists of one or more structures or buildings in a
contiguous area where integrated production operations are conducted
to manufacture or process tangible personal property to be ultimately
sold at retail. Such term shall not include any facility primarily operated
for the purpose of conveying or assisting in the conveyance of natural
gas, electricity, oil or water. A business may operate one or more
manufacturing or processing plants or facilities at different locations to
manufacture or process a single product of tangible personal property to
be ultimately sold at retail;
(D) "manufacturing or processing business" means a business that
utilizes an integrated production operation to manufacture, process,
fabricate, finish or assemble items for wholesale and retail distribution
as part of what is commonly regarded by the general public as an
industrial manufacturing or processing operation or an agricultural
commodity processing operation. (i) Industrial manufacturing or

HB 2004—Am. by SC 33
processing operations include, by way of illustration but not of
limitation, the fabrication of automobiles, airplanes, machinery or
transportation equipment, the fabrication of metal, plastic, wood or
paper products, electricity power generation, water treatment, petroleum
refining, chemical production, wholesale bottling, newspaper printing,
ready mixed concrete production, and the remanufacturing of used parts
for wholesale or retail sale. Such processing operations shall include
operations at an oil well, gas well, mine or other excavation site where
the oil, gas, minerals, coal, clay, stone, sand or gravel that has been
extracted from the earth is cleaned, separated, crushed, ground, milled,
screened, washed or otherwise treated or prepared before its
transmission to a refinery or before any other wholesale or retail
distribution. (ii) Agricultural commodity processing operations include,
by way of illustration but not of limitation, meat packing, poultry
slaughtering and dressing, processing and packaging farm and dairy
products in sealed containers for wholesale and retail distribution, feed
grinding, grain milling, frozen food processing, and grain handling,
cleaning, blending, fumigation, drying and aeration operations engaged
in by grain elevators or other grain storage facilities. (iii)
Manufacturing or processing businesses do not include, by way of
illustration but not of limitation, nonindustrial businesses whose
operations are primarily retail and that produce or process tangible
personal property as an incidental part of conducting the retail business,
such as retailers who bake, cook or prepare food products in the regular
course of their retail trade, grocery stores, meat lockers and meat
markets that butcher or dress livestock or poultry in the regular course
of their retail trade, contractors who alter, service, repair or improve real
property, and retail businesses that clean, service or refurbish and repair
tangible personal property for its owner;
(E) "repair and replacement parts and accessories" means all parts
and accessories for exempt machinery and equipment, including, but not
limited to, dies, jigs, molds, patterns and safety devices that are attached
to exempt machinery or that are otherwise used in production, and parts
and accessories that require periodic replacement such as belts, drill
bits, grinding wheels, grinding balls, cutting bars, saws, refractory brick
and other refractory items for exempt kiln equipment used in production
operations;
(F) "primary" or "primarily" mean more than 50% of the time.
(3) For purposes of this subsection, machinery and equipment shall
be deemed to be used as an integral or essential part of an integrated
production operation when used to:
(A) Receive, transport, convey, handle, treat or store raw materials
in preparation of its placement on the production line;

HB 2004—Am. by SC 34
(B) transport, convey, handle or store the property undergoing
manufacturing or processing at any point from the beginning of the
production line through any warehousing or distribution operation of
the final product that occurs at the plant or facility;
(C) act upon, effect, promote or otherwise facilitate a physical
change to the property undergoing manufacturing or processing;
(D) guide, control or direct the movement of property undergoing
manufacturing or processing;
(E) test or measure raw materials, the property undergoing
manufacturing or processing or the finished product, as a necessary part
of the manufacturer's integrated production operations;
(F) plan, manage, control or record the receipt and flow of
inventories of raw materials, consumables and component parts, the
flow of the property undergoing manufacturing or processing and the
management of inventories of the finished product;
(G) produce energy for, lubricate, control the operating of or
otherwise enable the functioning of other production machinery and
equipment and the continuation of production operations;
(H) package the property being manufactured or processed in a
container or wrapping in which such property is normally sold or
transported;
(I) transmit or transport electricity, coke, gas, water, steam or
similar substances used in production operations from the point of
generation, if produced by the manufacturer or processor at the plant
site, to that manufacturer's production operation; or, if purchased or
delivered from off-site, from the point where the substance enters the site
of the plant or facility to that manufacturer's production operations;
(J) cool, heat, filter, refine or otherwise treat water, steam, acid, oil,
solvents or other substances that are used in production operations;
(K) provide and control an environment required to maintain
certain levels of air quality, humidity or temperature in special and
limited areas of the plant or facility, where such regulation of
temperature or humidity is part of and essential to the production
process;
(L) treat, transport or store waste or other byproducts of production
operations at the plant or facility; or
(M) control pollution at the plant or facility where the pollution is
produced by the manufacturing or processing operation.
(4) The following machinery, equipment and materials shall be
deemed to be exempt even though it may not otherwise qualify as
machinery and equipment used as an integral or essential part of an
integrated production operation: (A) Computers and related peripheral
equipment that are utilized by a manufacturing or processing business

HB 2004—Am. by SC 35
for engineering of the finished product or for research and development
or product design; (B) machinery and equipment that is utilized by a
manufacturing or processing business to manufacture or rebuild
tangible personal property that is used in manufacturing or processing
operations, including tools, dies, molds, forms and other parts of
qualifying machinery and equipment; (C) portable plants for aggregate
concrete, bulk cement and asphalt including cement mixing drums to be
attached to a motor vehicle; (D) industrial fixtures, devices, support
facilities and special foundations necessary for manufacturing and
production operations, and materials and other tangible personal
property sold for the purpose of fabricating such fixtures, devices,
facilities and foundations. An exemption certificate for such purchases
shall be signed by the manufacturer or processor. If the fabricator
purchases such material, the fabricator shall also sign the exemption
certificate; (E) a manufacturing or processing business' laboratory
equipment that is not located at the plant or facility, but that would
otherwise qualify for exemption under subsection (3)(E); (F) all
machinery and equipment used in surface mining activities as described
in K.S.A. 49-601 et seq., and amendments thereto, beginning from the
time a reclamation plan is filed to the acceptance of the completed final
site reclamation.
(5) "Machinery and equipment used as an integral or essential part
of an integrated production operation" shall not include:
(A) Machinery and equipment used for nonproduction purposes,
including, but not limited to, machinery and equipment used for plant
security, fire prevention, first aid, accounting, administration, record
keeping, advertising, marketing, sales or other related activities, plant
cleaning, plant communications and employee work scheduling;
(B) machinery, equipment and tools used primarily in maintaining
and repairing any type of machinery and equipment or the building and
plant;
(C) transportation, transmission and distribution equipment not
primarily used in a production, warehousing or material handling
operation at the plant or facility, including the means of conveyance of
natural gas, electricity, oil or water, and equipment related thereto,
located outside the plant or facility;
(D) office machines and equipment including computers and
related peripheral equipment not used directly and primarily to control
or measure the manufacturing process;
(E) furniture and other furnishings;
(F) buildings, other than exempt machinery and equipment that is
permanently affixed to or becomes a physical part of the building, and
any other part of real estate that is not otherwise exempt;

HB 2004—Am. by SC 36
(G) building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing
operation, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air
conditioning, communications, plumbing or electrical;
(H) machinery and equipment used for general plant heating,
cooling and lighting;
(I) motor vehicles that are registered for operation on public
highways; or
(J) employee apparel, except safety and protective apparel that is
purchased by an employer and furnished gratuitously to employees who
are involved in production or research activities.
(6) Paragraphs (3) and (5) shall not be construed as exclusive
listings of the machinery and equipment that qualify or do not qualify as
an integral or essential part of an integrated production operation.
When machinery or equipment is used as an integral or essential part of
production operations part of the time and for nonproduction purposes
at other times, the primary use of the machinery or equipment shall
determine whether or not such machinery or equipment qualifies for
exemption.
(7) The secretary of revenue shall adopt rules and regulations
necessary to administer the provisions of this subsection;
(ll) all sales of educational materials purchased for distribution to
the public at no charge by a nonprofit corporation organized for the
purpose of encouraging, fostering and conducting programs for the
improvement of public health, except that for taxable years commencing
after December 31, 2013, this subsection shall not apply to any sales of
such materials purchased by a nonprofit corporation which performs
any abortion, as defined in K.S.A. 65-6701, and amendments thereto;
(mm) all sales of seeds and tree seedlings; fertilizers, insecticides,
herbicides, germicides, pesticides and fungicides; and services,
purchased and used for the purpose of producing plants in order to
prevent soil erosion on land devoted to agricultural use;
(nn) except as otherwise provided in this act, all sales of services
rendered by an advertising agency or licensed broadcast station or any
member, agent or employee thereof;
(oo) all sales of tangible personal property purchased by a
community action group or agency for the exclusive purpose of
repairing or weatherizing housing occupied by low-income individuals;
(pp) all sales of drill bits and explosives actually utilized in the
exploration and production of oil or gas;
(qq) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by a nonprofit museum or historical society or any combination thereof,
including a nonprofit organization that is organized for the purpose of
stimulating public interest in the exploration of space by providing

HB 2004—Am. by SC 37
educational information, exhibits and experiences, that is exempt from
federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986;
(rr) all sales of tangible personal property that will admit the
purchaser thereof to any annual event sponsored by a nonprofit
organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, except
that for taxable years commencing after December 31, 2013, this
subsection shall not apply to any sales of such tangible personal
property purchased by a nonprofit organization which performs any
abortion, as defined in K.S.A. 65-6701, and amendments thereto;
(ss) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by a public broadcasting station licensed by the federal communications
commission as a noncommercial educational television or radio station;
(tt) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased by
or on behalf of a not-for-profit corporation that is exempt from federal
income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code of 1986, for the sole purpose of constructing a Kansas
Korean War memorial;
(uu) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by or on behalf of any rural volunteer fire-fighting organization for use
exclusively in the performance of its duties and functions;
(vv) all sales of tangible personal property purchased by any of the
following organizations that are exempt from federal income taxation
pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of
1986, for the following purposes, and all sales of any such property by or
on behalf of any such organization for any such purpose:
(1) The American heart association, Kansas affiliate, inc. for the
purposes of providing education, training, certification in emergency
cardiac care, research and other related services to reduce disability and
death from cardiovascular diseases and stroke;
(2) the Kansas alliance for the mentally ill, inc. for the purpose of
advocacy for persons with mental illness and to education, research and
support for their families;
(3) the Kansas mental illness awareness council for the purposes of
advocacy for persons who are mentally ill and for education, research
and support for them and their families;
(4) the American diabetes association Kansas affiliate, inc. for the
purpose of eliminating diabetes through medical research, public
education focusing on disease prevention and education, patient
education including information on coping with diabetes, and
professional education and training;
(5) the American lung association of Kansas, inc. for the purpose of

HB 2004—Am. by SC 38
eliminating all lung diseases through medical research, public education
including information on coping with lung diseases, professional
education and training related to lung disease and other related services
to reduce the incidence of disability and death due to lung disease;
(6) the Kansas chapters of the Alzheimer's disease and related
disorders association, inc. for the purpose of providing assistance and
support to persons in Kansas with Alzheimer's disease, and their families
and caregivers;
(7) the Kansas chapters of the Parkinson's disease association for
the purpose of eliminating Parkinson's disease through medical
research and public and professional education related to such disease;
(8) the national kidney foundation of Kansas and western Missouri
for the purpose of eliminating kidney disease through medical research
and public and private education related to such disease;
(9) the heartstrings community foundation for the purpose of
providing training, employment and activities for adults with
developmental disabilities;
(10) the cystic fibrosis foundation, heart of America chapter, for the
purposes of assuring the development of the means to cure and control
cystic fibrosis and improving the quality of life for those with the
disease;
(11) the spina bifida association of Kansas for the purpose of
providing financial, educational and practical aid to families and
individuals with spina bifida. Such aid includes, but is not limited to,
funding for medical devices, counseling and medical educational
opportunities;
(12) the CHWC, Inc., for the purpose of rebuilding urban core
neighborhoods through the construction of new homes, acquiring and
renovating existing homes and other related activities, and promoting
economic development in such neighborhoods;
(13) the cross-lines cooperative council for the purpose of providing
social services to low income individuals and families;
(14) the dreams work, inc., for the purpose of providing young
adult day services to individuals with developmental disabilities and
assisting families in avoiding institutional or nursing home care for a
developmentally disabled member of their family;
(15) the KSDS, Inc., for the purpose of promoting the independence
and inclusion of people with disabilities as fully participating and
contributing members of their communities and society through the
training and providing of guide and service dogs to people with
disabilities, and providing disability education and awareness to the
general public;
(16) the lyme association of greater Kansas City, Inc., for the

HB 2004—Am. by SC 39
purpose of providing support to persons with lyme disease and public
education relating to the prevention, treatment and cure of lyme disease;
(17) the dream factory, inc., for the purpose of granting the dreams
of children with critical and chronic illnesses;
(18) the Ottawa Suzuki strings, inc., for the purpose of providing
students and families with education and resources necessary to enable
each child to develop fine character and musical ability to the fullest
potential;
(19) the international association of lions clubs for the purpose of
creating and fostering a spirit of understanding among all people for
humanitarian needs by providing voluntary services through community
involvement and international cooperation;
(20) the Johnson county young matrons, inc., for the purpose of
promoting a positive future for members of the community through
volunteerism, financial support and education through the efforts of an
all volunteer organization;
(21) the American cancer society, inc., for the purpose of
eliminating cancer as a major health problem by preventing cancer,
saving lives and diminishing suffering from cancer, through research,
education, advocacy and service;
(22) the community services of Shawnee, inc., for the purpose of
providing food and clothing to those in need;
(23) the angel babies association, for the purpose of providing
assistance, support and items of necessity to teenage mothers and their
babies; and
(24) the Kansas fairgrounds foundation for the purpose of the
preservation, renovation and beautification of the Kansas state
fairgrounds;
(ww) all sales of tangible personal property purchased by the
habitat for humanity for the exclusive use of being incorporated within a
housing project constructed by such organization;
(xx) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by a nonprofit zoo that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant
to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, or on
behalf of such zoo by an entity itself exempt from federal income
taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code of 1986 contracted with to operate such zoo and all sales of
tangible personal property or services purchased by a contractor for the
purpose of constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining,
repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities for any
nonprofit zoo that would be exempt from taxation under the provisions
of this section if purchased directly by such nonprofit zoo or the entity
operating such zoo. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to

HB 2004—Am. by SC 40
exempt the purchase of any construction machinery, equipment or tools
used in the constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining,
repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities for any
nonprofit zoo. When any nonprofit zoo shall contract for the purpose of
constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities, it shall obtain from the
state and furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for the
project involved, and the contractor may purchase materials for
incorporation in such project. The contractor shall furnish the number
of such certificate to all suppliers from whom such purchases are made,
and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering the same bearing the
number of such certificate. Upon completion of the project the
contractor shall furnish to the nonprofit zoo concerned a sworn
statement, on a form to be provided by the director of taxation, that all
purchases so made were entitled to exemption under this subsection. All
invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period of five years and
shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If any materials
purchased under such a certificate are found not to have been
incorporated in the building or other project or not to have been
returned for credit or the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
upon such materials that will not be so incorporated in the building or
other project reported and paid by such contractor to the director of
taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following the close of
the month in which it shall be determined that such materials will not be
used for the purpose for which such certificate was issued, the nonprofit
zoo concerned shall be liable for tax on all materials purchased for the
project, and upon payment thereof it may recover the same from the
contractor together with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any
agent, employee or subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise
dispose of any materials purchased under such a certificate for any
purpose other than that for which such a certificate is issued without the
payment of the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such
materials, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction
therefor, shall be subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-
3615(h), and amendments thereto;
(yy) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by a parent-teacher association or organization, and all sales of tangible
personal property by or on behalf of such association or organization;
(zz) all sales of machinery and equipment purchased by over-the-
air, free access radio or television station that is used directly and
primarily for the purpose of producing a broadcast signal or is such that
the failure of the machinery or equipment to operate would cause
broadcasting to cease. For purposes of this subsection, machinery and

HB 2004—Am. by SC 41
equipment shall include, but not be limited to, that required by rules and
regulations of the federal communications commission, and all sales of
electricity which are essential or necessary for the purpose of producing
a broadcast signal or is such that the failure of the electricity would
cause broadcasting to cease;
(aaa) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by a religious organization that is exempt from federal income taxation
pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, and
used exclusively for religious purposes, and all sales of tangible personal
property or services purchased by a contractor for the purpose of
constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities for any such organization
that would be exempt from taxation under the provisions of this section
if purchased directly by such organization. Nothing in this subsection
shall be deemed to exempt the purchase of any construction machinery,
equipment or tools used in the constructing, equipping, reconstructing,
maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities
for any such organization. When any such organization shall contract
for the purpose of constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining,
repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities, it shall obtain
from the state and furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for
the project involved, and the contractor may purchase materials for
incorporation in such project. The contractor shall furnish the number
of such certificate to all suppliers from whom such purchases are made,
and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering the same bearing the
number of such certificate. Upon completion of the project the
contractor shall furnish to such organization concerned a sworn
statement, on a form to be provided by the director of taxation, that all
purchases so made were entitled to exemption under this subsection. All
invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period of five years and
shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If any materials
purchased under such a certificate are found not to have been
incorporated in the building or other project or not to have been
returned for credit or the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
upon such materials that will not be so incorporated in the building or
other project reported and paid by such contractor to the director of
taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following the close of
the month in which it shall be determined that such materials will not be
used for the purpose for which such certificate was issued, such
organization concerned shall be liable for tax on all materials purchased
for the project, and upon payment thereof it may recover the same from
the contractor together with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or
any agent, employee or subcontractor thereof, who shall use or

HB 2004—Am. by SC 42
otherwise dispose of any materials purchased under such a certificate
for any purpose other than that for which such a certificate is issued
without the payment of the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
upon such materials, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon
conviction therefor, shall be subject to the penalties provided for in
K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and amendments thereto. Sales tax paid on and after
July 1, 1998, but prior to the effective date of this act upon the gross
receipts received from any sale exempted by the amendatory provisions
of this subsection shall be refunded. Each claim for a sales tax refund
shall be verified and submitted to the director of taxation upon forms
furnished by the director and shall be accompanied by any additional
documentation required by the director. The director shall review each
claim and shall refund that amount of sales tax paid as determined
under the provisions of this subsection. All refunds shall be paid from
the sales tax refund fund upon warrants of the director of accounts and
reports pursuant to vouchers approved by the director or the director's
designee;
(bbb) all sales of food for human consumption by an organization
that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)
(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, pursuant to a food
distribution program that offers such food at a price below cost in
exchange for the performance of community service by the purchaser
thereof;
(ccc) on and after July 1, 1999, all sales of tangible personal
property and services purchased by a primary care clinic or health
center the primary purpose of which is to provide services to medically
underserved individuals and families, and that is exempt from federal
income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code, and all sales of tangible personal property or services
purchased by a contractor for the purpose of constructing, equipping,
reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling facilities for any such clinic or center that would be exempt
from taxation under the provisions of this section if purchased directly
by such clinic or center, except that for taxable years commencing after
December 31, 2013, this subsection shall not apply to any sales of such
tangible personal property and services purchased by a primary care
clinic or health center which performs any abortion, as defined in K.S.A.
65-6701, and amendments thereto. Nothing in this subsection shall be
deemed to exempt the purchase of any construction machinery,
equipment or tools used in the constructing, equipping, reconstructing,
maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities
for any such clinic or center. When any such clinic or center shall
contract for the purpose of constructing, equipping, reconstructing,

HB 2004—Am. by SC 43
maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities, it
shall obtain from the state and furnish to the contractor an exemption
certificate for the project involved, and the contractor may purchase
materials for incorporation in such project. The contractor shall furnish
the number of such certificate to all suppliers from whom such
purchases are made, and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering
the same bearing the number of such certificate. Upon completion of the
project the contractor shall furnish to such clinic or center concerned a
sworn statement, on a form to be provided by the director of taxation,
that all purchases so made were entitled to exemption under this
subsection. All invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period of
five years and shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If any
materials purchased under such a certificate are found not to have been
incorporated in the building or other project or not to have been
returned for credit or the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
upon such materials that will not be so incorporated in the building or
other project reported and paid by such contractor to the director of
taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following the close of
the month in which it shall be determined that such materials will not be
used for the purpose for which such certificate was issued, such clinic or
center concerned shall be liable for tax on all materials purchased for
the project, and upon payment thereof it may recover the same from the
contractor together with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any
agent, employee or subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise
dispose of any materials purchased under such a certificate for any
purpose other than that for which such a certificate is issued without the
payment of the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such
materials, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction
therefor, shall be subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-
3615(h), and amendments thereto;
(ddd) on and after January 1, 1999, and before January 1, 2000, all
sales of materials and services purchased by any class II or III railroad
as classified by the federal surface transportation board for the
construction, renovation, repair or replacement of class II or III
railroad track and facilities used directly in interstate commerce. In the
event any such track or facility for which materials and services were
purchased sales tax exempt is not operational for five years succeeding
the allowance of such exemption, the total amount of sales tax that
would have been payable except for the operation of this subsection
shall be recouped in accordance with rules and regulations adopted for
such purpose by the secretary of revenue;
(eee) on and after January 1, 1999, and before January 1, 2001, all
sales of materials and services purchased for the original construction,

HB 2004—Am. by SC 44
reconstruction, repair or replacement of grain storage facilities,
including railroad sidings providing access thereto;
(fff) all sales of material handling equipment, racking systems and
other related machinery and equipment that is used for the handling,
movement or storage of tangible personal property in a warehouse or
distribution facility in this state; all sales of installation, repair and
maintenance services performed on such machinery and equipment; and
all sales of repair and replacement parts for such machinery and
equipment. For purposes of this subsection, a warehouse or distribution
facility means a single, fixed location that consists of buildings or
structures in a contiguous area where storage or distribution operations
are conducted that are separate and apart from the business' retail
operations, if any, and that do not otherwise qualify for exemption as
occurring at a manufacturing or processing plant or facility. Material
handling and storage equipment shall include aeration, dust control,
cleaning, handling and other such equipment that is used in a public
grain warehouse or other commercial grain storage facility, whether
used for grain handling, grain storage, grain refining or processing, or
other grain treatment operation;
(ggg) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by or on behalf of the Kansas academy of science, which is exempt from
federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, and used solely by such academy for the
preparation, publication and dissemination of education materials;
(hhh) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by or on behalf of all domestic violence shelters that are member
agencies of the Kansas coalition against sexual and domestic violence;
(iii) all sales of personal property and services purchased by an
organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, and such
personal property and services are used by any such organization in the
collection, storage and distribution of food products to nonprofit
organizations that distribute such food products to persons pursuant to a
food distribution program on a charitable basis without fee or charge,
and all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by a
contractor for the purpose of constructing, equipping, reconstructing,
maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities
used for the collection and storage of such food products for any such
organization which is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, that
would be exempt from taxation under the provisions of this section if
purchased directly by such organization. Nothing in this subsection
shall be deemed to exempt the purchase of any construction machinery,

HB 2004—Am. by SC 45
equipment or tools used in the constructing, equipping, reconstructing,
maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities
for any such organization. When any such organization shall contract
for the purpose of constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining,
repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities, it shall obtain
from the state and furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for
the project involved, and the contractor may purchase materials for
incorporation in such project. The contractor shall furnish the number
of such certificate to all suppliers from whom such purchases are made,
and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering the same bearing the
number of such certificate. Upon completion of the project the
contractor shall furnish to such organization concerned a sworn
statement, on a form to be provided by the director of taxation, that all
purchases so made were entitled to exemption under this subsection. All
invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period of five years and
shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If any materials
purchased under such a certificate are found not to have been
incorporated in such facilities or not to have been returned for credit or
the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials
that will not be so incorporated in such facilities reported and paid by
such contractor to the director of taxation not later than the 20th day of
the month following the close of the month in which it shall be
determined that such materials will not be used for the purpose for
which such certificate was issued, such organization concerned shall be
liable for tax on all materials purchased for the project, and upon
payment thereof it may recover the same from the contractor together
with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent, employee or
subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise dispose of any
materials purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other than
that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of the
sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto. Sales tax paid on and after July 1, 2005, but prior
to the effective date of this act upon the gross receipts received from any
sale exempted by the amendatory provisions of this subsection shall be
refunded. Each claim for a sales tax refund shall be verified and
submitted to the director of taxation upon forms furnished by the
director and shall be accompanied by any additional documentation
required by the director. The director shall review each claim and shall
refund that amount of sales tax paid as determined under the provisions
of this subsection. All refunds shall be paid from the sales tax refund
fund upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports pursuant to

HB 2004—Am. by SC 46
vouchers approved by the director or the director's designee;
(jjj) all sales of dietary supplements dispensed pursuant to a
prescription order by a licensed practitioner or a mid-level practitioner
as defined by K.S.A. 65-1626, and amendments thereto. As used in this
subsection, "dietary supplement" means any product, other than
tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that: (1) Contains one or more
of the following dietary ingredients: A vitamin, a mineral, an herb or
other botanical, an amino acid, a dietary substance for use by humans to
supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake or a
concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract or combination of any such
ingredient; (2) is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder,
softgel, gelcap or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion, in such a
form, is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for
use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and (3) is required to be
labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the supplemental facts
box found on the label and as required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. § 101.36;
(lll) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by special olympics Kansas, inc. for the purpose of providing year-round
sports training and athletic competition in a variety of olympic-type
sports for individuals with intellectual disabilities by giving them
continuing opportunities to develop physical fitness, demonstrate
courage, experience joy and participate in a sharing of gifts, skills and
friendship with their families, other special olympics athletes and the
community, and activities provided or sponsored by such organization,
and all sales of tangible personal property by or on behalf of any such
organization;
(mmm) all sales of tangible personal property purchased by or on
behalf of the Marillac center, inc., which is exempt from federal income
taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code, for the purpose of providing psycho-social-biological and special
education services to children, and all sales of any such property by or
on behalf of such organization for such purpose;
(nnn) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by the west Sedgwick county-sunrise rotary club and sunrise charitable
fund for the purpose of constructing a boundless playground which is
an integrated, barrier free and developmentally advantageous play
environment for children of all abilities and disabilities;
(ooo) all sales of tangible personal property by or on behalf of a
public library serving the general public and supported in whole or in
part with tax money or a not-for-profit organization whose purpose is to
raise funds for or provide services or other benefits to any such public
library;
(ppp) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased

HB 2004—Am. by SC 47
by or on behalf of a homeless shelter that is exempt from federal income
taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal income tax code of
1986, and used by any such homeless shelter to provide emergency and
transitional housing for individuals and families experiencing
homelessness, and all sales of any such property by or on behalf of any
such homeless shelter for any such purpose;
(qqq) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by TLC for children and families, inc., hereinafter referred to as TLC,
which is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)
(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, and such property and
services are used for the purpose of providing emergency shelter and
treatment for abused and neglected children as well as meeting
additional critical needs for children, juveniles and family, and all sales
of any such property by or on behalf of TLC for any such purpose; and
all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by a
contractor for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities for the operation of
services for TLC for any such purpose that would be exempt from
taxation under the provisions of this section if purchased directly by
TLC. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to exempt the purchase
of any construction machinery, equipment or tools used in the
constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling such facilities for TLC. When TLC contracts for the purpose
of constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling such facilities, it shall obtain from the state and furnish to
the contractor an exemption certificate for the project involved, and the
contractor may purchase materials for incorporation in such project.
The contractor shall furnish the number of such certificate to all
suppliers from whom such purchases are made, and such suppliers shall
execute invoices covering the same bearing the number of such
certificate. Upon completion of the project the contractor shall furnish
to TLC a sworn statement, on a form to be provided by the director of
taxation, that all purchases so made were entitled to exemption under
this subsection. All invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period
of five years and shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If
any materials purchased under such a certificate are found not to have
been incorporated in the building or other project or not to have been
returned for credit or the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
upon such materials that will not be so incorporated in the building or
other project reported and paid by such contractor to the director of
taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following the close of
the month in which it shall be determined that such materials will not be
used for the purpose for which such certificate was issued, TLC shall be

HB 2004—Am. by SC 48
liable for tax on all materials purchased for the project, and upon
payment thereof it may recover the same from the contractor together
with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent, employee or
subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise dispose of any
materials purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other than
that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of the
sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto;
(rrr) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by any county law library maintained pursuant to law and sales of
tangible personal property and services purchased by an organization
that would have been exempt from taxation under the provisions of this
subsection if purchased directly by the county law library for the
purpose of providing legal resources to attorneys, judges, students and
the general public, and all sales of any such property by or on behalf of
any such county law library;
(sss) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by catholic charities or youthville, hereinafter referred to as charitable
family providers, which is exempt from federal income taxation
pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of
1986, and which such property and services are used for the purpose of
providing emergency shelter and treatment for abused and neglected
children as well as meeting additional critical needs for children,
juveniles and family, and all sales of any such property by or on behalf
of charitable family providers for any such purpose; and all sales of
tangible personal property or services purchased by a contractor for the
purpose of constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling facilities for the operation of services for charitable
family providers for any such purpose which would be exempt from
taxation under the provisions of this section if purchased directly by
charitable family providers. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed
to exempt the purchase of any construction machinery, equipment or
tools used in the constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging,
furnishing or remodeling such facilities for charitable family providers.
When charitable family providers contracts for the purpose of
constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling such facilities, it shall obtain from the state and furnish to
the contractor an exemption certificate for the project involved, and the
contractor may purchase materials for incorporation in such project.
The contractor shall furnish the number of such certificate to all
suppliers from whom such purchases are made, and such suppliers shall

HB 2004—Am. by SC 49
execute invoices covering the same bearing the number of such
certificate. Upon completion of the project the contractor shall furnish
to charitable family providers a sworn statement, on a form to be
provided by the director of taxation, that all purchases so made were
entitled to exemption under this subsection. All invoices shall be held by
the contractor for a period of five years and shall be subject to audit by
the director of taxation. If any materials purchased under such a
certificate are found not to have been incorporated in the building or
other project or not to have been returned for credit or the sales or
compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials that will not
be so incorporated in the building or other project reported and paid by
such contractor to the director of taxation not later than the 20th day of
the month following the close of the month in which it shall be
determined that such materials will not be used for the purpose for
which such certificate was issued, charitable family providers shall be
liable for tax on all materials purchased for the project, and upon
payment thereof it may recover the same from the contractor together
with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent, employee or
subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise dispose of any
materials purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other than
that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of the
sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto;
(ttt) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by
a contractor for a project for the purpose of restoring, constructing,
equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling a home or facility owned by a nonprofit museum that has
been granted an exemption pursuant to subsection (qq), which such
home or facility is located in a city that has been designated as a
qualified hometown pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 75-5071 et seq.,
and amendments thereto, and which such project is related to the
purposes of K.S.A. 75-5071 et seq., and amendments thereto, and that
would be exempt from taxation under the provisions of this section if
purchased directly by such nonprofit museum. Nothing in this
subsection shall be deemed to exempt the purchase of any construction
machinery, equipment or tools used in the restoring, constructing,
equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling a home or facility for any such nonprofit museum. When
any such nonprofit museum shall contract for the purpose of restoring,
constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling a home or facility, it shall obtain

HB 2004—Am. by SC 50
from the state and furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for
the project involved, and the contractor may purchase materials for
incorporation in such project. The contractor shall furnish the number
of such certificates to all suppliers from whom such purchases are made,
and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering the same bearing the
number of such certificate. Upon completion of the project, the
contractor shall furnish to such nonprofit museum a sworn statement on
a form to be provided by the director of taxation that all purchases so
made were entitled to exemption under this subsection. All invoices shall
be held by the contractor for a period of five years and shall be subject to
audit by the director of taxation. If any materials purchased under such
a certificate are found not to have been incorporated in the building or
other project or not to have been returned for credit or the sales or
compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials that will not
be so incorporated in a home or facility or other project reported and
paid by such contractor to the director of taxation not later than the 20th
day of the month following the close of the month in which it shall be
determined that such materials will not be used for the purpose for
which such certificate was issued, such nonprofit museum shall be liable
for tax on all materials purchased for the project, and upon payment
thereof it may recover the same from the contractor together with
reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent, employee or
subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise dispose of any
materials purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other than
that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of the
sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto;
(uuu) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by Kansas children's service league, hereinafter referred to as KCSL,
which is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)
(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, and which such
property and services are used for the purpose of providing for the
prevention and treatment of child abuse and maltreatment as well as
meeting additional critical needs for children, juveniles and family, and
all sales of any such property by or on behalf of KCSL for any such
purpose; and all sales of tangible personal property or services
purchased by a contractor for the purpose of constructing, maintaining,
repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities for the
operation of services for KCSL for any such purpose that would be
exempt from taxation under the provisions of this section if purchased
directly by KCSL. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to exempt

HB 2004—Am. by SC 51
the purchase of any construction machinery, equipment or tools used in
the constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling such facilities for KCSL. When KCSL contracts for the
purpose of constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling such facilities, it shall obtain from the state and furnish to
the contractor an exemption certificate for the project involved, and the
contractor may purchase materials for incorporation in such project.
The contractor shall furnish the number of such certificate to all
suppliers from whom such purchases are made, and such suppliers shall
execute invoices covering the same bearing the number of such
certificate. Upon completion of the project the contractor shall furnish
to KCSL a sworn statement, on a form to be provided by the director of
taxation, that all purchases so made were entitled to exemption under
this subsection. All invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period
of five years and shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If
any materials purchased under such a certificate are found not to have
been incorporated in the building or other project or not to have been
returned for credit or the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
upon such materials that will not be so incorporated in the building or
other project reported and paid by such contractor to the director of
taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following the close of
the month in which it shall be determined that such materials will not be
used for the purpose for which such certificate was issued, KCSL shall
be liable for tax on all materials purchased for the project, and upon
payment thereof it may recover the same from the contractor together
with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent, employee or
subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise dispose of any
materials purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other than
that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of the
sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto;
(vvv) all sales of tangible personal property or services, including
the renting and leasing of tangible personal property or services,
purchased by jazz in the woods, inc., a Kansas corporation that is
exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the
federal internal revenue code, for the purpose of providing jazz in the
woods, an event benefiting children-in-need and other nonprofit
charities assisting such children, and all sales of any such property by or
on behalf of such organization for such purpose;
(www) all sales of tangible personal property purchased by or on
behalf of the Frontenac education foundation, which is exempt from

HB 2004—Am. by SC 52
federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code, for the purpose of providing education support
for students, and all sales of any such property by or on behalf of such
organization for such purpose;
(xxx) all sales of personal property and services purchased by the
booth theatre foundation, inc., an organization, which is exempt from
federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, and which such personal property and
services are used by any such organization in the constructing,
equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling of the booth theatre, and all sales of tangible personal
property or services purchased by a contractor for the purpose of
constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling the booth theatre for such
organization, that would be exempt from taxation under the provisions
of this section if purchased directly by such organization. Nothing in this
subsection shall be deemed to exempt the purchase of any construction
machinery, equipment or tools used in the constructing, equipping,
reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling facilities for any such organization. When any such
organization shall contract for the purpose of constructing, equipping,
reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling facilities, it shall obtain from the state and furnish to the
contractor an exemption certificate for the project involved, and the
contractor may purchase materials for incorporation in such project.
The contractor shall furnish the number of such certificate to all
suppliers from whom such purchases are made, and such suppliers shall
execute invoices covering the same bearing the number of such
certificate. Upon completion of the project the contractor shall furnish
to such organization concerned a sworn statement, on a form to be
provided by the director of taxation, that all purchases so made were
entitled to exemption under this subsection. All invoices shall be held by
the contractor for a period of five years and shall be subject to audit by
the director of taxation. If any materials purchased under such a
certificate are found not to have been incorporated in such facilities or
not to have been returned for credit or the sales or compensating tax
otherwise imposed upon such materials that will not be so incorporated
in such facilities reported and paid by such contractor to the director of
taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following the close of
the month in which it shall be determined that such materials will not be
used for the purpose for which such certificate was issued, such
organization concerned shall be liable for tax on all materials purchased
for the project, and upon payment thereof it may recover the same from

HB 2004—Am. by SC 53
the contractor together with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or
any agent, employee or subcontractor thereof, who shall use or
otherwise dispose of any materials purchased under such a certificate
for any purpose other than that for which such a certificate is issued
without the payment of the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
upon such materials, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon
conviction therefor, shall be subject to the penalties provided for in
K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and amendments thereto. Sales tax paid on and after
January 1, 2007, but prior to the effective date of this act upon the gross
receipts received from any sale which would have been exempted by the
provisions of this subsection had such sale occurred after the effective
date of this act shall be refunded. Each claim for a sales tax refund shall
be verified and submitted to the director of taxation upon forms
furnished by the director and shall be accompanied by any additional
documentation required by the director. The director shall review each
claim and shall refund that amount of sales tax paid as determined
under the provisions of this subsection. All refunds shall be paid from
the sales tax refund fund upon warrants of the director of accounts and
reports pursuant to vouchers approved by the director or the director's
designee;
(yyy) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by TLC charities foundation, inc., hereinafter referred to as TLC
charities, which is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, and which
such property and services are used for the purpose of encouraging
private philanthropy to further the vision, values, and goals of TLC for
children and families, inc.; and all sales of such property and services by
or on behalf of TLC charities for any such purpose and all sales of
tangible personal property or services purchased by a contractor for the
purpose of constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling facilities for the operation of services for TLC charities
for any such purpose that would be exempt from taxation under the
provisions of this section if purchased directly by TLC charities. Nothing
in this subsection shall be deemed to exempt the purchase of any
construction machinery, equipment or tools used in the constructing,
maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling such
facilities for TLC charities. When TLC charities contracts for the
purpose of constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling such facilities, it shall obtain from the state and furnish to
the contractor an exemption certificate for the project involved, and the
contractor may purchase materials for incorporation in such project.
The contractor shall furnish the number of such certificate to all
suppliers from whom such purchases are made, and such suppliers shall

HB 2004—Am. by SC 54
execute invoices covering the same bearing the number of such
certificate. Upon completion of the project the contractor shall furnish
to TLC charities a sworn statement, on a form to be provided by the
director of taxation, that all purchases so made were entitled to
exemption under this subsection. All invoices shall be held by the
contractor for a period of five years and shall be subject to audit by the
director of taxation. If any materials purchased under such a certificate
are found not to have been incorporated in the building or other project
or not to have been returned for credit or the sales or compensating tax
otherwise imposed upon such materials that will not be incorporated into
the building or other project reported and paid by such contractor to the
director of taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following the
close of the month in which it shall be determined that such materials
will not be used for the purpose for which such certificate was issued,
TLC charities shall be liable for tax on all materials purchased for the
project, and upon payment thereof it may recover the same from the
contractor together with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any
agent, employee or subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise
dispose of any materials purchased under such a certificate for any
purpose other than that for which such a certificate is issued without the
payment of the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such
materials, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction
therefor, shall be subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-
3615(h), and amendments thereto;
(zzz) all sales of tangible personal property purchased by the rotary
club of shawnee foundation, which is exempt from federal income
taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code of 1986, as amended, used for the purpose of providing
contributions to community service organizations and scholarships;
(aaaa) all sales of personal property and services purchased by or
on behalf of victory in the valley, inc., which is exempt from federal
income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code, for the purpose of providing a cancer support group and
services for persons with cancer, and all sales of any such property by or
on behalf of any such organization for any such purpose;
(bbbb) all sales of entry or participation fees, charges or tickets by
Guadalupe health foundation, which is exempt from federal income
taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code, for such organization's annual fundraising event which purpose is
to provide health care services for uninsured workers;
(cccc) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased
by or on behalf of wayside waifs, inc., which is exempt from federal
income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal

HB 2004—Am. by SC 55
revenue code, for the purpose of providing such organization's annual
fundraiser, an event whose purpose is to support the care of homeless
and abandoned animals, animal adoption efforts, education programs
for children and efforts to reduce animal over-population and animal
welfare services, and all sales of any such property, including entry or
participation fees or charges, by or on behalf of such organization for
such purpose;
(dddd) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased
by or on behalf of goodwill industries or Easter seals of Kansas, inc.,
both of which are exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, for the purpose of
providing education, training and employment opportunities for people
with disabilities and other barriers to employment;
(eeee) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased
by or on behalf of all American beef battalion, inc., which is exempt
from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code, for the purpose of educating, promoting and
participating as a contact group through the beef cattle industry in order
to carry out such projects that provide support and morale to members of
the United States armed forces and military services;
(ffff) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by sheltered living, inc., which is exempt from federal income taxation
pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of
1986, and which such property and services are used for the purpose of
providing residential and day services for people with developmental
disabilities or intellectual disability, or both, and all sales of any such
property by or on behalf of sheltered living, inc., for any such purpose;
and all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by a
contractor for the purpose of rehabilitating, constructing, maintaining,
repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling homes and facilities for
sheltered living, inc., for any such purpose that would be exempt from
taxation under the provisions of this section if purchased directly by
sheltered living, inc. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to
exempt the purchase of any construction machinery, equipment or tools
used in the constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling such homes and facilities for sheltered living, inc. When
sheltered living, inc., contracts for the purpose of rehabilitating,
constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling such homes and facilities, it shall obtain from the state and
furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for the project
involved, and the contractor may purchase materials for incorporation
in such project. The contractor shall furnish the number of such
certificate to all suppliers from whom such purchases are made, and

HB 2004—Am. by SC 56
such suppliers shall execute invoices covering the same bearing the
number of such certificate. Upon completion of the project the
contractor shall furnish to sheltered living, inc., a sworn statement, on a
form to be provided by the director of taxation, that all purchases so
made were entitled to exemption under this subsection. All invoices shall
be held by the contractor for a period of five years and shall be subject to
audit by the director of taxation. If any materials purchased under such
a certificate are found not to have been incorporated in the building or
other project or not to have been returned for credit or the sales or
compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials that will not
be so incorporated in the building or other project reported and paid by
such contractor to the director of taxation not later than the 20th day of
the month following the close of the month in which it shall be
determined that such materials will not be used for the purpose for
which such certificate was issued, sheltered living, inc., shall be liable
for tax on all materials purchased for the project, and upon payment
thereof it may recover the same from the contractor together with
reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent, employee or
subcontractor thereof, who shall use or otherwise dispose of any
materials purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other than
that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of the
sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto;
(gggg) all sales of game birds for which the primary purpose is use
in hunting;
(hhhh) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased
on or after July 1, 2014, for the purpose of and in conjunction with
constructing, reconstructing, enlarging or remodeling a business
identified under the North American industry classification system
(NAICS) subsectors 1123, 1124, 112112, 112120 or 112210, and the sale
and installation of machinery and equipment purchased for installation
at any such business. The exemption provided in this subsection shall
not apply to projects that have actual total costs less than $50,000. When
a person contracts for the construction, reconstruction, enlargement or
remodeling of any such business, such person shall obtain from the state
and furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for the project
involved, and the contractor may purchase materials, machinery and
equipment for incorporation in such project. The contractor shall
furnish the number of such certificates to all suppliers from whom such
purchases are made, and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering
the same bearing the number of such certificate. Upon completion of the

HB 2004—Am. by SC 57
project, the contractor shall furnish to the owner of the business a sworn
statement, on a form to be provided by the director of taxation, that all
purchases so made were entitled to exemption under this subsection. All
invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period of five years and
shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. Any contractor or
any agent, employee or subcontractor of the contractor, who shall use or
otherwise dispose of any materials, machinery or equipment purchased
under such a certificate for any purpose other than that for which such
a certificate is issued without the payment of the sales or compensating
tax otherwise imposed thereon, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and,
upon conviction therefor, shall be subject to the penalties provided for in
K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and amendments thereto;
(iiii) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by
a contractor for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities for the operation of
services for Wichita children's home for any such purpose that would be
exempt from taxation under the provisions of this section if purchased
directly by Wichita children's home. Nothing in this subsection shall be
deemed to exempt the purchase of any construction machinery,
equipment or tools used in the constructing, maintaining, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling such facilities for Wichita
children's home. When Wichita children's home contracts for the
purpose of constructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing
or remodeling such facilities, it shall obtain from the state and furnish to
the contractor an exemption certificate for the project involved, and the
contractor may purchase materials for incorporation in such project.
The contractor shall furnish the number of such certificate to all
suppliers from whom such purchases are made, and such suppliers shall
execute invoices covering the same bearing the number of such
certificate. Upon completion of the project, the contractor shall furnish
to Wichita children's home a sworn statement, on a form to be provided
by the director of taxation, that all purchases so made were entitled to
exemption under this subsection. All invoices shall be held by the
contractor for a period of five years and shall be subject to audit by the
director of taxation. If any materials purchased under such a certificate
are found not to have been incorporated in the building or other project
or not to have been returned for credit or the sales or compensating tax
otherwise imposed upon such materials that will not be so incorporated
in the building or other project reported and paid by such contractor to
the director of taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following
the close of the month in which it shall be determined that such
materials will not be used for the purpose for which such certificate was
issued, Wichita children's home shall be liable for the tax on all

HB 2004—Am. by SC 58
materials purchased for the project, and upon payment, it may recover
the same from the contractor together with reasonable attorney fees. Any
contractor or any agent, employee or subcontractor, who shall use or
otherwise dispose of any materials purchased under such a certificate
for any purpose other than that for which such a certificate is issued
without the payment of the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
upon such materials, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon
conviction, shall be subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-
3615(h), and amendments thereto;
(jjjj) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by
or on behalf of the beacon, inc., that is exempt from federal income
taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code, for the purpose of providing those desiring help with food, shelter,
clothing and other necessities of life during times of special need;
(kkkk) all sales of tangible personal property and services
purchased by or on behalf of reaching out from within, inc., which is
exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the
federal internal revenue code, for the purpose of sponsoring self-help
programs for incarcerated persons that will enable such incarcerated
persons to become role models for non-violence while in correctional
facilities and productive family members and citizens upon return to the
community;
(llll) all sales of tangible personal property and services purchased
by Gove county healthcare endowment foundation, inc., which is exempt
from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, and which such property and services are
used for the purpose of constructing and equipping an airport in
Quinter, Kansas, and all sales of tangible personal property or services
purchased by a contractor for the purpose of constructing and equipping
an airport in Quinter, Kansas, for such organization, that would be
exempt from taxation under the provisions of this section if purchased
directly by such organization. Nothing in this subsection shall be
deemed to exempt the purchase of any construction machinery,
equipment or tools used in the constructing or equipping of facilities for
such organization. When such organization shall contract for the
purpose of constructing or equipping an airport in Quinter, Kansas, it
shall obtain from the state and furnish to the contractor an exemption
certificate for the project involved, and the contractor may purchase
materials for incorporation in such project. The contractor shall furnish
the number of such certificate to all suppliers from whom such
purchases are made, and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering
the same bearing the number of such certificate. Upon completion of the
project, the contractor shall furnish to such organization concerned a

HB 2004—Am. by SC 59
sworn statement, on a form to be provided by the director of taxation,
that all purchases so made were entitled to exemption under this
subsection. All invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period of
five years and shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If any
materials purchased under such a certificate are found not to have been
incorporated in such facilities or not to have been returned for credit or
the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials
that will not be so incorporated in such facilities reported and paid by
such contractor to the director of taxation no later than the 20th day of
the month following the close of the month in which it shall be
determined that such materials will not be used for the purpose for
which such certificate was issued, such organization concerned shall be
liable for tax on all materials purchased for the project, and upon
payment thereof it may recover the same from the contractor together
with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent, employee or
subcontractor thereof, who purchased under such a certificate for any
purpose other than that for which such a certificate is issued without the
payment of the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such
materials, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction
therefor, shall be subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-
3615(h), and amendments thereto. The provisions of this subsection
shall expire and have no effect on and after July 1, 2019;
(mmmm) all sales of gold or silver coins; and palladium, platinum,
gold or silver bullion. For the purposes of this subsection, "bullion"
means bars, ingots or commemorative medallions of gold, silver,
platinum, palladium, or a combination thereof, for which the value of
the metal depends on its content and not the form;
(nnnn) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased
by friends of hospice of Jefferson county, an organization that is exempt
from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, for the purpose of providing support to
the Jefferson county hospice agency in end-of-life care of Jefferson
county families, friends and neighbors, and all sales of entry or
participation fees, charges or tickets by friends of hospice of Jefferson
county for such organization's fundraising event for such purpose;
(oooo) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased
for the purpose of and in conjunction with constructing, reconstructing,
enlarging or remodeling a qualified business facility by a qualified firm
or qualified supplier that meets the requirements established in K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 74-50,312 and 74-50,319, and amendments thereto, and that
has been approved for a project exemption certificate by the secretary of
commerce, and the sale and installation of machinery and equipment
purchased by such qualified firm or qualified supplier for installation at

HB 2004—Am. by SC 60
any such qualified business facility. When a person shall contract for the
construction, reconstruction, enlargement or remodeling of any such
qualified business facility, such person shall obtain from the state and
furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for the project
involved, and the contractor may purchase materials, machinery and
equipment for incorporation in such project. The contractor shall
furnish the number of such certificates to all suppliers from whom such
purchases are made, and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering
the same bearing the number of such certificate. Upon completion of the
project, the contractor shall furnish to the owner of the qualified firm or
qualified supplier a sworn statement, on a form to be provided by the
director of taxation, that all purchases so made were entitled to
exemption under this subsection. All invoices shall be held by the
contractor for a period of five years and shall be subject to audit by the
director of taxation. Any contractor or any agent, employee or
subcontractor thereof who shall use or otherwise dispose of any
materials, machinery or equipment purchased under such a certificate
for any purpose other than that for which such a certificate is issued
without the payment of the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
thereon, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor,
shall be subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto. As used in this subsection, "qualified business
facility," "qualified firm" and "qualified supplier" mean the same as
defined in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-50,311, and amendments thereto;
(pppp) (1) all sales of tangible personal property or services
purchased by a not-for-profit corporation that is designated as an area
agency on aging by the secretary for aging and disabilities services and
is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of
the federal internal revenue code for the purpose of coordinating and
providing seniors and those living with disabilities with services that
promote person-centered care, including home-delivered meals,
congregate meal settings, long-term case management, transportation,
information, assistance and other preventative and intervention services
to help service recipients remain in their homes and communities or for
the purpose of constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining,
repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities for such area
agency on aging; and
(2) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by
a contractor for the purpose of constructing, equipping, reconstructing,
maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities
for an area agency on aging that would be exempt from taxation under
the provisions of this section if purchased directly by such area agency
on aging. Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to exempt the

HB 2004—Am. by SC 61
purchase of any construction machinery, equipment or tools used in the
constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities for an area agency on
aging. When an area agency on aging contracts for the purpose of
constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing,
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling facilities, it shall obtain from the
state and furnish to the contractor an exemption certificate for the
project involved, and such contractor may purchase materials for
incorporation in such project. The contractor shall furnish the number
of such certificate to all suppliers from whom such purchases are made,
and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering the same bearing the
number of such certificate. Upon completion of the project, the
contractor shall furnish to such area agency on aging a sworn
statement, on a form to be provided by the director of taxation, that all
purchases so made were entitled to exemption under this subsection. All
invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period of five years and
shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If any materials
purchased under such a certificate are found not to have been
incorporated in the building or other project or not to have been
returned for credit or the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed
upon such materials that will not be so incorporated in the building or
other project reported and paid by such contractor to the director of
taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following the close of
the month in which it shall be determined that such materials will not be
used for the purpose for which such certificate was issued, the area
agency on aging concerned shall be liable for tax on all materials
purchased for the project, and upon payment thereof, the area agency
on aging may recover the same from the contractor together with
reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent, employee or
subcontractor thereof who shall use or otherwise dispose of any
materials purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other than
that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of the
sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto;
(qqqq) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased
by Kansas suicide prevention HQ, inc., an organization that is exempt
from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, for the purpose of bringing suicide
prevention training and awareness to communities across the state;
(rrrr) all sales of the services of slaughtering, butchering, custom
cutting, dressing, processing and packaging of an animal for human

HB 2004—Am. by SC 62
consumption when the animal is delivered or furnished by a customer
that owns the animal and such meat or poultry is for use or consumption
by such customer;
(ssss) all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased
by or on behalf of doorstep inc., an organization that is exempt from
federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, for the purpose of providing short-term
emergency aid to families and individuals in need, including assistance
with food, clothing, rent, prescription medications, transportation and
utilities, and providing information on services to promote long-term
self-sufficiency;
(tttt) on and after January 1, 2024, all sales of tangible personal
property or services purchased by exploration place, inc., an
organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to
section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, and which such
property and services are used for the purpose of constructing,
remodeling, furnishing or equipping a riverfront amphitheater, a
destination playscape, an education center and indoor renovations at
exploration place in Wichita, Kansas, all sales of tangible personal
property or services purchased by Kansas children's discovery center
inc. in Topeka, Kansas, and which such property and services are used
for the purpose of constructing, remodeling, furnishing or equipping
projects that include indoor-outdoor classrooms, an expanded multi-
media gallery, a workshop and loading dock and safety upgrades such as
a tornado shelter, lactation room, first aid room and sensory room and
all sales of tangible personal property or services purchased by a
contractor for the purpose of constructing, remodeling, furnishing or
equipping such projects, for such organizations, that would be exempt
from taxation under the provisions of this section if purchased directly
by such organizations. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to
exempt the purchase of any construction machinery, equipment or tools
used in the constructing, remodeling, furnishing or equipping of
facilities for such organization. When such organization shall contract
for the purpose of constructing, remodeling, furnishing or equipping
such projects, it shall obtain from the state and furnish to the contractor
an exemption certificate for the project involved, and the contractor may
purchase materials for incorporation in such project. The contractor
shall furnish the number of such certificate to all suppliers from whom
such purchases are made, and such suppliers shall execute invoices
covering the same bearing the number of such certificate. Upon
completion of the project, the contractor shall furnish to such
organization a sworn statement, on a form to be provided by the director
of taxation, that all purchases so made were entitled to exemption under

HB 2004—Am. by SC 63
this subsection. All invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period
of five years and shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If
any materials purchased under such a certificate are found not to have
been incorporated in such facilities or not to have been returned for
credit or the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such
materials that will not be so incorporated in such facilities reported and
paid by such contractor to the director of taxation no later than the 20th
day of the month following the close of the month in which it shall be
determined that such materials will not be used for the purpose for
which such certificate was issued, such organization shall be liable for
tax on all materials purchased for the project, and upon payment thereof
may recover the same from the contractor together with reasonable
attorney fees. Any contractor or agent, employee or subcontractor
thereof, who purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other
than that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of
the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials,
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto. Sales tax paid on and after January 1, 2024, but
prior to the effective date of this act, upon the gross receipts received
from any sale exempted by the amendatory provisions of this subsection
shall be refunded. Each claim for a sales tax refund shall be verified and
submitted to the director of taxation upon forms furnished by the
director and shall be accompanied by any additional documentation
required by the director. The director shall review each claim and shall
refund that amount of sales tax paid as determined under the provisions
of this subsection. All refunds shall be paid from the sales tax refund
fund upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports pursuant to
vouchers approved by the director or the director's designee. The
provisions of this subsection shall expire and have no effect on and after
December 31, 2030;
(uuuu) (1) (A) all sales of equipment, machinery, software,
ancillary components, appurtenances, accessories or other
infrastructure purchased for use in the provision of communications
services; and
(B) all services purchased by a provider in the provision of the
communications service used in the repair, maintenance or installation
in such communications service.
(2) As used in this subsection:
(A) "Communications service" means internet access service,
telecommunications service, video service or any combination thereof.
(B) "Equipment, machinery, software, ancillary components,
appurtenances, accessories or other infrastructure" includes, but is not

HB 2004—Am. by SC 64
limited to:
(i) Wires, cables, fiber, conduits, antennas, poles, switches, routers,
amplifiers, rectifiers, repeaters, receivers, multiplexers, duplexers,
transmitters, circuit cards, insulating and protective materials and cases,
power equipment, backup power equipment, diagnostic equipment,
storage devices, modems, cable modem termination systems and servers;
(ii) other general central office or headend equipment, such as
channel cards, frames and cabinets;
(iii) equipment used in successor technologies, including items used
to monitor, test, maintain, enable or facilitate qualifying equipment,
machinery, software, ancillary components, appurtenances and
accessories; and
(iv) other infrastructure that is used in whole or in part to provide
communications services, including broadcasting, distributing, sending,
receiving, storing, transmitting, retransmitting, amplifying, switching,
providing connectivity for or routing communications services.
(C) "Internet access service" means the same as internet access as
defined in section 1105 of the internet tax freedom act amendments of
2007, public law 110-108.
(D) "Provider" means a person or entity that sells communications
service, including an affiliate or subsidiary.
(E) "Telecommunications service" means the same as defined in
K.S.A. 79-3602, and amendments thereto.
(F) "Video service" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 12-2022,
and amendments thereto.
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall expire and have no effect
on and after July 1, 2029;
(vvvv) (1) all sales of tangible personal property or services
purchased by a contractor for the purpose of constructing, equipping,
reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling a building that is operated by, or is intended to be operated
by, the Kansas fairgrounds foundation, a not-for-profit corporation
exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the
federal internal revenue code of 1986, and located on the grounds of the
Kansas state fair, and such tangible personal property would be exempt
from taxation under the provisions of this paragraph if purchased
directly by such eligible not-for-profit corporation. Nothing in this
subsection shall be deemed to exempt the purchase of any construction
machinery, equipment or tools used in the constructing, equipping,
reconstructing, maintaining, repairing, enlarging, furnishing or
remodeling a building for such eligible not-for-profit corporation. When
such eligible not-for-profit corporation contracts for the purpose of
constructing, equipping, reconstructing, maintaining, repairing,

HB 2004—Am. by SC 65
enlarging, furnishing or remodeling a building, such corporation shall
obtain from the state and furnish to the contractor an exemption
certificate for the project involved, and such contractor may purchase
materials for incorporation in such project. The contractor shall furnish
the number of such certificate to all suppliers from whom such
purchases are made, and such suppliers shall execute invoices covering
such purchases bearing the number of such certificate. Upon completion
of the project, the contractor shall furnish to such eligible not-for-profit
corporation a sworn statement, on a form to be provided by the director
of taxation, that all purchases so made were entitled to exemption under
this subsection. All invoices shall be held by the contractor for a period
of five years and shall be subject to audit by the director of taxation. If
any materials purchased under such a certificate are found not to have
been incorporated in the building or returned for credit, the contractor
shall report and pay the sales or compensating tax to the director of
taxation not later than the 20th day of the month following the close of
the month in which it is determined that such materials will not be used
for the purpose for which such certificate was issued. The eligible not-
for-profit corporation concerned shall be liable for tax on all materials
purchased for the project, and upon payment thereof, the eligible not-
for-profit corporation may recover the same from the contractor
together with reasonable attorney fees. Any contractor or any agent,
employee or subcontractor thereof who shall use or otherwise dispose of
any materials purchased under such a certificate for any purpose other
than that for which such a certificate is issued without the payment of
the sales or compensating tax otherwise imposed upon such materials
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be
subject to the penalties provided for in K.S.A. 79-3615(h), and
amendments thereto.
(2) Sales tax paid on and after May 19, 2023, but prior to the
effective date of this act upon the gross receipts received from any sale
which would have been exempted by the provisions of this subsection
had such sale occurred after the effective date of this act shall be
refunded. Each claim for a sales tax refund shall be verified and
submitted to the director of taxation upon forms furnished by the
director and shall be accompanied by any additional documentation
required by the director. The director shall review each claim and shall
refund that amount of sales tax paid as determined under the provisions
of this subsection. All refunds shall be paid from the sales tax refund
fund upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports pursuant to
vouchers approved by the director or the director's designee; and
(wwww) (1) all sales of tangible personal property or services
purchased by a pregnancy resource center or residential maternity

HB 2004—Am. by SC 66
facility.
(2) As used in this subsection, "pregnancy resource center" or
"residential maternity facility" means an organization that is:
(A) Exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986;
(B) a nonprofit organization organized under the laws of this state;
and
(C) a pregnancy resource center or residential maternity facility
that:
(i) Maintains a dedicated phone number for clients;
(ii) maintains in this state its primary physical office, clinic or
residential home that is open for clients for a minimum of 20 hours per
week, excluding state holidays;
(iii) offers services, at no cost to the client, for the express purpose
of providing assistance to women in order to carry their pregnancy to
term, encourage parenting or adoption, prevent abortion and promote
healthy childbirth; and
(iv) utilizes trained healthcare providers, as defined by K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 79-32,316, and amendments thereto, to perform any available
medical procedures; and
(xxxx) on and after July 1, 2024, all sales of tangible personal
property and services purchased by or on behalf of care to share cancer
support group of Bourbon county, Kansas, inc., an organization that is
exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the
federal internal revenue code, for the purpose of providing a cancer
support group and services for persons with cancer, and all sales of
tangible personal property and services by or on behalf of such
organization for any such purpose. Sales tax paid on and after July 1,
2024, but prior to the effective date of this act, upon the gross receipts
received from any sales purchased by or on behalf of such organization
exempted by the amendatory provisions of this subsection shall be
refunded. Each claim for a sales tax refund shall be verified and submitted
to the director of taxation upon forms furnished by the director and shall
be accompanied by any additional documentation required by the director.
The director shall review each claim and shall refund the amount of sales
tax paid as determined under the provisions of this subsection. All refunds
shall be paid from the sales tax refund fund upon warrants of the director
of accounts and reports pursuant to vouchers approved by the director or
the director's designee.
Sec. 4. 5. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-187, 12-189 and, 12-192 and 79-
3606 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 5. 6. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.